THE LITTLE FRENCHMAN
AND
HIS WATER LOTS.
A
Look into those they call unfortunate,
And, closer view'd, you'll find they are unwise.
Young
.
Let wealth come in by comely thrift,
And not by any foolish shift:
'Tis haste
Makes waste:
Who gripes too hard the dry and slippery sand
Holds none at all, or little, in his hand.
Herrick
.
Let well alone.
Proverb
.
How
much real comfort every one might enjoy,
if he would be contented with the lot in which
heaven has cast him, and how much trouble would
be avoided if people would only let well alone.
A moderate independence, quietly and honestly
procured, is certainly every way preferable even to
immense possessions achieved by the wear and tear
of mind and body so necessary to procure them.
Yet there are very few individuals, let them be
doing ever so well in the world, who are not always
straining every nerve to do better; and this is one
of the many causes why failures in business so
frequently occur among us. The present
generation
seem unwilling to realize by slow and sure
degrees; but choose rather to set their whole hopes
upon a single cast, which either makes or mars them
for ever!
Gentle reader, do you remember Monsieur Poopoo?
He used to keep a small toy-store in Chatham, near
the corner of Pearl-street. You
must
recollect him,
of course. He lived there for many years, and was
one of the most polite and accommodating of
shop-keepers
.
When a juvenile, you have bought tops
and marbles of him a thousand times. To be sure
you have; and seen his vinegar-visage lighted up
with a smile as you flung him the coppers; and
you have laughed at his little straight queue and
his dimity breeches, and all the other oddities that
made up the every-day apparel of my little
Frenchman
.
Ah, I perceive you recollect him now.
Well, then, there lived Monsieur Poopoo ever
since he came from dear, delightful Paris, as he was
wont to call the city of his nativitythere he took in
the pennies for his kickshawsthere he laid aside
five thousand dollars against a rainy daythere he
was as happy as a larkand there, in all human
probability, he would have been to this very day,
a respected and substantial citizen, had he been
willing to let well alone. But Monsieur Poopoo
had heard strange stories about the prodigious rise
in real estate; and, having understood that most of
his neighbours had become suddenly rich by
speculating
in lots, he instantly grew dissatisfied with
his own lot, forthwith determined to shut up shop,
turn everything into cash, and set about making
money in right-down earnest. No sooner said than
done; and our quondam storekeeper a few days
afterward attended an extensive sale of real estate,
at the Merchants' Exchange.
There was the auctioneer, with his beautiful and
inviting lithographick mapsall the lots as smooth
and square and enticingly laid out as possibleand
there were the speculatorsand there, in the midst
of them, stood Monsieur Poopoo.
Here they are, gentlemen, said he of the
hammer
,
the most valuable lots ever offered for sale.
Give me a bid for them?
One hundred each, said a bystander.
One hundred! said the auctioneer, scarcely
enough to pay for the maps. One hundredgoing
and fiftygone! Mr. H. they are yours. A
noble
purchase. You'll sell those same lots in
less-than
a fortnight for fifty thousand dollars profit!
Monsieur Poopoo pricked up his ears at this, and
A*
was lost in astonishment. This was a much easier
way certainly of accumulating riches than selling
toys in Chatham-street, and he determined to buy
and mend his fortune without delay.
The auctioneer proceeded in his sale. Other
parcels
were offered and disposed of, and all the
purchasers
were promised immense advantages for their
enterprise. At last came a more valuable parcel
than all the rest. The company pressed around
the stand, and Monsieur Poopoo did the same.
I now offer you, gentlemen, these magnificent
lots, delightfully situated on Long-Island, with
valuable
water privileges. Property in feetitle
indisputable
terms
of sale, cashdeeds ready for
delivery immediately after the sale. How much for
them? Give them a start at something. How
much? The auctioneer looked around; there were
no bidders. At last he caught the eye of Monsieur
Poopoo. Did you say one hundred, sir?
Beautiful
lotsvaluable water privilegesshall I say one
hundred for you?
Oui, monsieur;
I will give you von hundred
dollar
a piece, for de lot vid de valuarble vatare
privalege
;
c'est a
.
Only one hundred a piece for these sixty
valuable
lotsonly one hundredgoinggoinggoing
gone!
Monsieur Poopoo was the fortunate possessor.
The auctioneer congratulated himthe sale closed
and the company dispersed.
Pardonnez moi, monsieur
, said Poopoo, as the
auctioneer descended his pedestal, you shall
excusez
moi
, if I shall go to
votre bureau
, your counting-house,
ver quick to make every ting sure wid respec to de
lot vid de valuarble vatare privalege. Von leetle
bird in de hand he vorth two in de tree,
c'est vrai
eh?
Certainly, sir.
Vell den,
allons
.
And the gentlemen repaired to the counting-house,
where the six thousand dollars were paid, and the
deeds of the property delivered. Monsieur Poopoo
put these carefully in his pocket, and as he was
about taking his leave, the auctioneer made him a
present of the lithographick outline of the lots, which
was a very liberal thing on his part, considering the
map was a beautiful specimen of that glorious art.
Poopoo could not admire it sufficiently. There were
his sixty lots, as uniform as possible, and his little
gray eyes sparkled like diamonds as they wandered
from one end of the spacious sheet to the other.
Poopoo's heart was as light as a feather, and he
snapped his fingers in the very wantonness of joy as
he repaired to Delmonico's, and ordered the first
good French dinner that had gladdened his palate
since his arrival in America.
After having discussed his repast, and washed it
down with a bottle of choice old claret, he resolved
upon a visit to Long-Island to view his purchase.
He consequently immediately hired a horse and gig,
crossed the Brooklyn ferry, and drove along the
margin of the river to the Wallabout, the location in
question.
Our friend, however, was not a little perplexed to
find his property. Everything on the map was as
fair and even as possible, while all the grounds about
him were as undulated as they could well be
imagined
,
and there was an elbow of the East-river
thrusting
itself quite into the ribs of the land, which seemed
to have no business there. This puzzled the
Frenchman
exceedingly; and, being a stranger in those parts,
he called to a farmer in an adjacent field.
Mon ami
, are you acquaint vid dis part of de
countryeh?
Yes, I was born here, and know every inch of
it.
Ah,
c'est bien
, dat vill do, and the Frenchman
got out of the gig, tied the horse, and produced his
lithographick map.
Den maybe you vill have de kindness to show
me de sixty lot vich I have bought, vid de valuarble
vatare privalege?
The farmer glanced his eye over the paper.
Yes, sir, with pleasure; if you will be good
enough to
get into my boat, I will row you out to them!
Vat dat you say, sare?
My friend, said the farmer, this section of
Long Island has recently been bought up by the
speculators of New-York, and laid out for a great
city; but the principal street is only visible
at low
tide
. When this part of the East-River is filled up,
it will be just there. Your lots, as you will perceive,
are beyond it;
and are now all under water
.
At first the Frenchman was incredulous. He
could not believe his senses. As the facts, however,
gradually broke upon him, he shut one eye, squinted
obliquely at the heavensthe riverthe farmer
and then he turned away and squinted at them
all over again! There was his purchase sure
enough; but then it could not be perceived for
there was a river flowing over it! He drew a
box from his waistcoat pocket, opened it, with an
emphatick knock upon the lid, took a pinch of snuff
and restored it to his waistcoat pocket as before.
Poopoo was evidently in trouble, having thoughts
which often lie too deep for tears; and, as his grief
was also too big for words, he untied his horse,
jumped into his gig, and returned to the auctioneer
in hot haste.
It was near night when he arrived at the
auction-room
his
horse in a foam and himself in a fury.
The auctioneer was leaning back in his chair, with
his legs stuck out of a low window, quietly smoking
a cigar after the labours of the day, and humming
the musick from the last new opera.
Monsieur, I have much plaisir to fin you,
chez
vous
, at home.
Ah, Poopoo! glad to see you. Take a seat, old
boy.
But I shall not take de seat, sare.
Nowhy, what's the matter?
Oh,
beaucoup
de matter. I have been to see de
gran lot vot you sell me to-day.
Well, sir, I hope you like your purchase?
No, monsieur, I no like him.
I'm sorry for it; but there is no ground for your
complaint.
No, sare; dare is no
ground
at allde ground
is all vatare!
You joke!
I no joke. I nevare joke;
je n'entends pas la raillerie
.
Sare,
voulez vous
have de kindness to give
me back de money vot I pay!
Certainly not.
Den vill you be so good as to take de East-River
off de top of my lot?
That's your business, sir, not mine.
Den I make von
mauvaise affaire
von gran
mistake
!
I hope not. I don't think you have thrown your
money away in the
land
.
No, sare; but I tro it avay in de
vatare!
That's not my fault.
Yes, sare, but it is your fault. You're von ver
gran rascal to swindle me out of
de l'argent
.
Hollo, old Poopoo, you grow personal; and if
you can't keep a civil tongue in your head, you must
go out of my counting-room.
Vare shall I go to, eh?
To the devil, for aught I care, you foolish old
Frenchman! said the auctioneer, waxing warm.
But, sare, I vill not go to de devil to oblige you!
replied the Frenchman, waxing warmer. You
sheat me out of all de dollar vot I make in
Shathame-street
;
but I vill not go to de devil for all dat. I
vish you may go to de devil yourself you dem
yankee-doo-dell
,
and I vill go and drown myself,
tout de
suite
, right avay.
You couldn't make a better use of your water
privileges, old boy!
Ah,
misricorde!
Ah,
mon dieu, je suis abm
. I am
ruin! I am done up! I am break all into ten
sousan leetle pieces! I am von lame duck, and I
shall vaddle across de gran ocean for Paris, vish
is de only valuarble vatare privilege dat is left me
present!
Poor Poopoo was as good as his word. He sailed
in the next packet, and arrived in Paris almost as
pennyless as the day he left it.
Should any one feel disposed to doubt the
veritable
circumstances here recorded, let him cross
the East River to the Wallabout, and farmer J******
will
row him out
to the very place where the poor
Frenchman's lots still remain
under water
.
THE MONOPOLY
AND
THE PEOPLE'S LINE.
He hears
On all sides, from innumerable tongues,
A dismal universal hiss, the sound
Of public scorn.
Milton
.
Applause
Waits on success; the fickle multitude,
Like the light straw that floats along the stream,
Glide with the current.
Franklin
.
Two of a trade can never agree.
Proverb
.
The
proprietors of steamboats, rail-roads and
stage-coaches, not unfrequently carry the spirit of
competition to a ruinous and ridiculous extent. A
few years ago, we went to Albany and were found
for half a dollar! and it is within the recollection of
everybody that Gibbons, for a long period, run his
boats from New-York to New-Brunswick for twelve
and a half cents! More recently, Mr. Vanderbilt,
a large capitalist, and doubtless an enterprising man,
with a view of breaking down what has been
denominated
the odious eastern monopoly, has placed
several swift and commodious steamers on the
Boston
line, and you may now take a trip from
New-York
to Providence for the trifling consideration of
one dollar, lawful currency! Whether the publick
the misused, flattered, cajoled, long-suffering and
indulgent publickis ultimately benefited by these
reductions of the fare to an inadequate price, or
otherwise, is not for us to determine; and we,
therefore
,
leave the investigation of the subject, now and
for ever, to those more skilled and curious in such
matters. Yet we have a right to an opinion; and,
as this is certainly a free country, we presume no
one will quarrel with usif we keep it entirely to
ourselves. In a crowded steamer, however, whose
deck and cabin are thronged with what the great
bard calls all sorts of people, there is no more
comfort than there is said to be in a badly-governed
family of small innocents and antiquated maiden
ladies, on a washing-day; when, the old ballad
tells us, all is topsy-turvy and most admired
confusion
.
Yet we would not be understood as
raising
our feeble voice in defence of any monopoly
under the sun; but more especially that of
steamboats
.
Far be it from us. We are patriots; but,
what is a greater evidence of our honesty and
disinterestedness
,
B*
we have no stock in them whatever;
and, as we are nothing but a waif upon the world's
wide common, or, in less figurative phraseology,
nothing but a poor devil of a weakly editor, we
never expect to have any; unless our delinquent
subscribers should pay up their arrearages: or we
should draw a prize in the lottery, or some unknown
or unheard of rich relation should die, and
unexpectedly
shower his bounties upon us; or any other
unimaginable, improbable, and impossible thing
should occur, of which we have not the remotest
conception at this present writing. We, therefore,
of course, prefer a spirited and liberally managed
opposition in all cases, whenever the number of
travellers will warrant such an arrangement; and
when mere angry feelings, jealousy, hatred, and all
uncharitableness, are not the governing motive and
groundwork of the competition. But we have often
noted, that the great contending parties have
generally
some concealed motive, some private end in
view, and that, while they are endeavouring, like
the Hibernian cats, to eat each other upall up!
they profess the most profound respect and regard
for that publick, which, in the main, they are
constantly
striving to humbug and overreach. The
publick, however, like a
re
-publick, is proverbially
ungrateful; and, seeing the pains that people take
to impose upon each other, it does not hesitate, in its
turn, to impose upon everybody. Our reminiscences
furnish us with a case in point.
Not many years ago, there lived on Long-Island,
a jolly, well-to-do, honest, old Dutchman, who drove
a stage from Brooklyn to Jamaica for two dollars a
passenger. This had been the charge since Adam
was an urchin, or since the time whereof the memory
of man runneth not to the contrary. It was
sanctioned
by immemorial usage, and had all the crust of
antiquity about it. Nobody thought of disputing the
matter. It was settled, like the laws of the Medes
and Persians, and was a thing not to be
sacrilegiously
meddled with, or altered on any account
whatever. The proprietor's great-grandfather had
driven the same route, and so had all his other
ancestors
,
and none of them had managed to realize more
than enough to make both ends meet when Christmas
came round. But it was left for these degenerate
days, and for modern innovators, to work wonderful
changes in the destinies of Jamaica, which was then
a mere dot on the unexplored map of Long-Island.
You might have held it in the hollow of your hand,
or Major Noah could have put it into his breeches
pocket. It has assumed vast consequence since
that periodwhich was before the discovery of
lithography, unqestionably the most magnificent and
imposing art of modern timesand is an
incorporated
cityin embryo!with its mayor and its
aldermenits commodious edificesits steeples,
domes, and court-housesits spacious taverns and
its heaven-aspiring liberty-rods, and all the other
requisites of a thriving American metropolis! If
the future greatness of Jamaica may be gathered
from the thousands of building-lots that have been
laid out and disposed of for slow notes of hand, and
if one may at all rely upon the prophecies of the
eloquent and disinterested speculators of Wall-street,
who look into the seeds of time, and say which
place
shall grow and which shall not, then is
Jamaica
,
without the shadow of a doubt, predestined
to become the capital of the world!
Oh, Lithography! let me apostrophize thee! Thou
art indeed a mighty wizardand hast performed
more miracles in our day and generation than all
the soothsayers, seers, and necromancers of the olden
time! There is no obstacle that thou canst not
overcomeno difficulty that thou canst not
surmount
!
Does a mountain oppose thy onward march
one wave of thy wand, and it hides its diminished
head and disappears for ever! Is a valley too deep
and broad for thy lofty purposesanother flourish
of thy potent staff, and lo! it is as level as the plain!
Is a river inconvenient to ford, and does it endeavour
to frustrate thy plans, thou hast but to will itand,
presto! its waters recede, and the warm and genial
earth, beautifully checkered and converted into
streets, avenues, spacious squares and desirable
building-lots, remains in its stead! Thou canst
people the wildernessfor the woods, like those of
Birnam, will unfix their earth-bound roots, and
move before theeand thou canst command the
desert to bud and blossom like the rose, and it is
even so! Thou canst found settlements, villages,
towns, and cities wherever thou listethin the
interiour
,
by the running river, the quiet lake, or on the
more boisterous borders of the ocean? 'Tis all the
same to thee, Lithography. Thou canst do
anything
every
thingall things
on paper!
But I am wandering from my subject; and must
take care that, in my admiration for the most
sublime
of all modern inventionsalways save and
excepting
the noble science of money-makingI do
not lose the reader as well as myself in the
labyrinths
of imagination and metaphor.
In the course of time, travelling increased on the
Jamaica turnpike; the Dutchman had his stage full
every trip, and began to thrive. But the star of his
good fortune, although it had risen clear and
unclouded
,
was not long in the ascendant; for, one
fine morning, there came another stage driver, the
owner of a new turn out, as fine as a fiddle, who put
in his claims for patronage.
He was a full-grown stripling, of little credit, but
some ready money, and he secretly resolved upon
bearing off the palm from the quiet, but covetous
Dutchman. At first he demanded the usual rates,
and divided the business with his old-established
rival; but finding that he had less custom, that he
was looked upon as an interloper, and that all faces
were set against him, he resolved to cut down the
fare to a single dollarand he did so, greatly to the
satisfaction of the applauding multitude.
This was a sad blow to the prospects of the poor
old Dutchman, whose carriage was instantly
deserted
,
all the fickle populace instinctively flocking to
the glossy vehicle of his adversary, who cracked his
whip in high glee as he dashed along the dusty and
unpaved streets of Brooklyn. At first Mynheer did
not know what to make of the matter, so he lighted
his pipe and looked to St. Nicholas for the solution
of a mystery, altogether too profound for his
comprehension
.
One day, however, a friend unravelled
it to him, and suggested the propriety of a reduction
also of his price; whereupon the whole truth flashed
upon him in the twinkling of an eye, and he instantly
resolved in defiance of the good examples of his
forefathers
,
to humble himself to the insignificant fare of
his pestilent competitor. Now all was right again,
and things went on as swimmingly as before, until
the new-comer again lowered the farecalled his
omnibus the People's Line, and branded his
opponent's
The Monopoly; upon which the
Dutchman
flew into a violent passion, broke his pipe into
a thousand pieces, and swore by all the saints in the
calendar, that he would thereafter carry his
passengers
for nothing! And so strange was his demeanor,
flying hither and yonder in a hurricane of hot haste
and hotter disdain, that all his neighbours
stigmatised
him as the Flying Dutchman; a name which
he has never been able to get clear of to this very
hour.
The People's Line, not in the least
disconcerted
by this unexpected calamity, also came down to
nothing!
and painted on the panels of the carriage
the figure of a fiery old man addressing a multitude,
and begging them to ride in his carriage gratis, with
the motto,
Nothing can come of nothing;
try
again.
This was evidently intended as a hit at the Flying
Dutchman, who retorted by staining the
Interloper
,
as he always persisted in designating the
People's Line, with certain Dutch epithets, which
respect for our readers prevents us from translating
into veritable English. Fierce were the animosities
bitter the feudsand arduous the struggles that
ensued between the belligerents. Long they lasted,
and fatal promised to be the consequences to both.
Every expedient was resorted to; but as neither
would yield an inch of ground to the other, they both
went on, season after season, running the stages at
their own expense, and annoying everybody who
would listen to them, with a full and particular
recital
of their wrongs, their wrath, and their
wranglings
.
At last, the owner of the People's Line,
fairly wearied out by the obstinacy and perseverance
of the redoubtable Dutchman, caused a mammoth
handbill to be struck off and posted from the
East-River
to the Atlantic Ocean, in which he stated, in
ponderous capital letters, that he would not only
carry his passengers for nothing, but that he would
actually pay each and every one the sum of
twenty-five
cents for going! To the unhappy Dutchman this
was the drop too much; and it effectually did the
business for his now unpopular and detested
Monopoly
,
which was denounced at every tavern by
the road side, as a paltry, mean, and
unconstitutional
concern, while the People's Line was
lauded to the third heavens for its liberality and
publick spirit. The Flying Dutchman flew no more.
His spirit was evidently broken as well as his
prospects
,
C
and his horses crawled daily to and from
Jamaica at a snail's pace, equally unmindful of whip
or reinevidently sympathizing in their master's
disappointment and discomfiture. Yet go the
Dutchman
wouldhe had become accustomed to the
occupationit was second nature to him; and, as
he could not easily overcome the force of habit, he
preferred working for nothing and finding himself, to
relinquishing the road entirely to his indefatigable
annoyer. His shirtless Majesty! as some
audacious
poet has impertinently called the sovereign
people! however, generally gave its countenance
and support to its own line, which still kept up its
speed and its reputation. It speaks volumes
volumes, did I say? it speaks ten thousand libraries
for the intelligence and good feeling of our
locomotive
countrymen; and, as faithful chroniclers,
we are bound to record the fact, that not a single
individual ever applied for the two shillings, that
had been so generously and disinterestedly tendered,
every one being actually contented with going the
whole distance gratis, and with being thanked into
the bargain!
One day, however, a long, thin, lank-sided,
mahogany-faced
downeaster chanced to read the
mammoth
bill with the ponderous capitals; and without
a moment's hesitation, he decided upon bestowing
his corporeal substance snugly in the back seat of
the People's Line; and it so fell out that he was
the only passenger.
The down-easter was a talkative, prying,
speculative
,
jimcrack of a fellow, who propounded more
questions in a single minute than one could answer
in a whole hour; and, in less time than you could
say Jack Robinson, he was at the bottom of all the
difficulty, and in possession of every particular
respecting
the rival lines. He was free of speech
and merry; joked with the proprietor; ridiculed
the flying Dutchman, called him a cockalorum, and
finally denounced him as an inflated, overgrown,
purse-proud capitalist, who advocated a system of
exclusive privileges contrary to the spirit of our
glorious institutions, and dangerous to the liberties
of the country?and he even went so far as to
recommend
that a town meeting should be immediately
called to put the old blockhead down, and banish
him from the sunshine of the publick favour forever!
I
will
put him down! said the driver.
And he shall stay
put
, when he
is
down! replied
Jonathan, with an approving nod of the head.
At the various stopping-places, Jonathanwho
was not a member of any of the temperance
societies
,
for those institutions were not founded at the
time of which we are writingto show his good
fellowship, but with no other motive, did not scruple
to drink sundry villanous bar-room compounds, at
the expense of his new acquaintance, who, that day,
was so overjoyed to find that the stage of the
Monopoly
was compelled to go the whole route
entirely empty, that his hilarity and flow of
boisterous
humour knew no bounds, and he snapped his
fingers, and said he did not care a fig for the expense
not he?
Here's to the People's Line! drank Jonathan.
The People's Line for ever! shouted the driver.
And confusion to the Monopoly! rejoined the
down-easter.
With all my heart! echoed the friend of the
people.
The Flying Dutchman is deficient in publick
spirit! said the landlord, a warlike little fellow,
who was a major in the militia.
Behind the age we live in! remarked a justice
of the peace.
And he deserves to run the gauntlet from
Brooklyn
to Jamaica for violating the constitution!
responded
all the patriotick inmates of the bar-room.
I say, mister! you're a fine specimen of a liberal
fellow, said Jonathan, as his companion paid the
reckoning, resumed the ribands, and touched up the
leaders gayly. You deserve encouragement, and
you shall have it. I promise it to you, my lad,
continued he, as he slapped the People's Line on
the shoulder like an old and familiar friend, and
that's enough. The Flying Dutchman, forsooth!
why, he's a hundred years at least behind the grand
march of improvement, and, as he will never be
able to overtake it, I shall henceforward look upon
him as a mere abstract circumstance, unworthy of
the least regard or notice.
Jonathan weighed every word of the last sentence
before he pronounced it, for he was, upon the whole,
rather a cute chap, and had no notion of letting his
friendship for the one party involve him in a law-suit
for a libel on the other.
The overjoyed proprietor thanked him heartily for
his good wishes, and for the expression of his
contempt
for the old Monopoly, and the lumbering
vehicle thundered on toward Jamaica.
Arrived, at last, at the termination of the journey,
C*
the driver unharnassed the horses, watered them,
and put them up for the night. When he turned to
take his own departure, however, he observed that
Jonathan, who, after all said and done, candour
compels us to acknowledge, had rather a hang-dog
sort of look, seemed fidgetty and discontented; that
he lingered about the stable, and followed him like
a shadow wherever he bent his steps.
Do you stop in this town, or do you go further?
asked the driver.
I shall go further, when you settle the trifle you
owe me, replied Jonathan, with a peculiar, knowing,
but serious expression.
That
I
owe you?
Yesis there not
something
between us?
Not that I know of.
Why, mister, what a short memory you've got
you should study mnemonicks, to put you in mind
of your engagements.
What do you mean? There must be some
mistake!
Oh! but there's no mistake at all, said
Jonathan
,
as he pulled a handbill from his pocket,
unfolded
it with care, and smoothed it out upon the
table. It was the identical mammoth handbill with
the ponderous capitals.
That's what I mean. Look there, Mr. People's
Line. There I have you, large as lifeand no
mistake whatever. That's your note of handit's
a fair business transactionand I will trouble you
for the twenty-five cents, in less than no time; so
shell it out, you 'tarnal crittur.
My christian friend, allow me to explain, if you
please. I confess that it's in the bill; but, bless
your simple soul, nobody ever thinks of asking me
for it.
Did you ever! ejaculated Jonathan. Now,
that's what I call cutting it a leetle too fat! but it's
nothing to me. I attend to nobody's affairs but my
own; and if other people are such ninnyhammers
as to forgive you the debt, that's no reason why I
should follow their bad example. Here are your
conditions, and I want the mopuses. A pretty piece
of business, truly, to endeavour to do your customers
out of their just and legal demands in this manner.
But I can't afford to lose the amount, and I won't!
What! haven't I freely given you my patronage
liberally bestowed upon you the pleasure of my
company, and, consequently, afforded you a triumph
over that narrow-contracted `Monopoly?' and now
you refuse to comply with your terms of travel, and
pay me my money, you ungrateful varmint, you!
Come, mister, it's no use putting words together in
this way. I'll expose you to `old Monopoly' and
everybody else, if you don't book-up like an honest
fellow; and I won't leave the town until I am
satisfied.
You won't?
No.
Are you serious?
Guess you'll find I am.
And you
will
have the money?
As sure as you stand there.
What, the twenty-five cents?
Every fraction of it.
And you won't go away without it?
Not if I stay here till doomsday: and you know
the consequence of detaining me against my will.
What is it?
I'll swinge you, you
pyson sarpent
, you!
You'll what?
I'll sue you for damages.
You will?
Yes; I'll law you to death, sooner than be
defrauded
out of my property in this manner; so, down
with the dust, and no more grumbling about it.
The bewildered and crest-fallen proprietor,
perceiving
from Jonathan's tone and manner, that all
remonstrance would be in vain, and that he was
irrevocably fixed in his determination to extract
twenty-five cents from his already exhausted coffers,
at length slowly and reluctantly put into his hand
the bit of silver coin representing that amount of the
circulating medium.
Jonathan, we blush to say, took the money, and
what is more, he put it into his pocket; and, what
is moreover, he positively buttoned it up, as if to
make assurance double sure, and to guard it
against the possibility of escape.
Mister, said he, after he had gone coolly through
the ceremony, looking all the while as innocently as
a man who has just performed a virtuous action;
mister, I say, you must not think that I set any
more value on the insignificant trifle you have paid
me, than any other gentleman: a twenty-five cent
piece, after all, is hardly worth disputing about
it's only a quarter of a dollarwhich any industrious
person may earn in half an hour, if he choosesthe
merest trifle in the worlda poor little scoundrel of a
coin, that I would not, under other circumstances,
touch with a pair of tongsand which I would scorn
to take even now
if it were not for the principle of the
thing!
To show you, however, that I entertain a high
respect for the People's Line, that I wish old
cockalorum
to the devil, and that I do not harbour the
slightest ill-will toward you for so unjustifiably
withholding
my legal demands, the next time I come this
way again, I will unquestionably give your stage the
preferenceunless the Flying Dutchman holds out
greater inducements than you do,
in which case, I
rather calculate, I shall feel myself in duty bound to
encourage him!
Since the veritable circumstances here related,
the Jamaica rail-road has entirely superseded the
necessity of both the Monopoly and the People's
Line of stages, and their publick-spirited
proprietors
,
after making a prodigious noise in the world,
have retired under the shade of their laurels, deep
into the recesses of private life. There we shall
leave them, to enjoy whatever satisfaction may be
gathered from the proud consolation of having
expended
every farthing they were worth in the world,
for the gratification of a publick that has long ago
forgotten they ever existed!
SKETCHES FROM THE SPRINGS.
LETTER ONE.
D
Full oft have letters caused the writers
To curse the day they were inditers.
Hudibras
.
These things from rumour's tongue
I idly heard; if true, or false, I know not.
Shakspeare
.
Saratoga Springs
,
July
22, 1838.
Dear Theodore
The jaunt from Albany to
Saratoga
,
over the rail-road, can now be accomplished
in less than three hours, and the consequence is that,
even at this early season, nearly all the hotels and
board-houses in the village are thronged with visitors.
There cannot be less than three thousand strangers
here at the present time, and every car is constantly
adding to the number. Congress-hall is, as formerly,
the resort of the light-hearted, the gay, the idle,
and the fashionable; but those who come to partake
of the life-giving waters, generally repair to more
congenial and quiet abodes. To those disposed to
be busy, there is no lack of employment. What with
eating and drinking, walking and riding, gunning
and fishing, dancing and flirtingballs, concerts,
and partiesdressing for this, that, and the other,
and similar suitable, and equally profitable
occupations
,
time is disposed of without the least difficulty.
Every thing is calculated to beguile one of pensive
thoughts, and occasionally there is an
entertainment
of no ordinary description. The other
evening
,
for instance, we had a musical
soire
, in which
that sweet song-bird, Miss Hughes, assisted by
Charles Horn, Sinclair, and other professional persons
took part. The large room of the United States
hotel was occupied by an audience resembling those
which attended the Cooper and Dunlap festivals.
All the performers were in fine spirits, and sung and
played delightfully. The Young Cavalier, the
Mermaid's Cave, and Auld Robin Gray, in
particular, were given by Miss Hughes in her own
impressive manner, and are now remembered as
faded strains that float upon the mind like
half-forgotten
dreams. This young lady never looked
more lovely, nor warbled her melodies with more
effect.
Gossip, scandal, and killing character, are
considered
innocent pastime at Saratoga. I am writing
this at a window that overlooks the piazza of
Congress-hall
.
The weather is pleasantthe shades
of evening thicken slowly, and the tide of fashion
is flowing beneath me like the waves of the sea. I
have been told the history and condition of
numerous
individuals, and, for want of better materials,
and in compliance with the universal custom of all
periodical letter-writers, I will point out a few of the
most conspicuous for your especial diversion.
First, we have a whole platoon of gentlemen with
canes, most of whom have been the subjects of much
enviable conversation lately. Johnson says that a
person who carries a cane has generally an upper
story to let! The doctor was undoubtedly a very
great man and a close observer of human nature.
His opinions, with me, have all the sanction of law
authority.
You perceive that stout gentlemen in black? He
is an epicure, and does little else than eat, the
live-long
day. He made a voyage to London last year
expressly for the purpose of enjoying a dish of soles
with shrimp sauce! and has come to the springs
now to put his digestive apparatus in good order,
before the ensuing season of plum-puddings,
buck-wheat-cakes
and mince-pies, three prime articles, of
which he professes to be exceedingly fond, and of
which he is supposed, about the holidays, to destroy a
most inordinate quantity. He plays the best knife
and fork in the village, and is the admiration of all
the gourmands at the south. Move on, old Falstaff!
Room for a travelled dandya fellow who went
abroad a puppy, and returned the same old two
and six pencenothing added to his former stock
of information, except the cut of his garments, a
D*
short-napped hat, and that pair of enormous whiskers
in all of which he reigns and revels!
Yonder floats a little man, with a little stick, a
little pair of gloves, and a little voice. He is
engaged
to that enormously fat young widow beside him,
whose fortune is estimated at sixty thousand dollars.
The little man is not worth a groat, and is the very
antipodes of his dulcinea; but you know,
In joining contrasts lieth love's delight.
Here comes a foreigner of distinctiona duke!
Mark his princely air and noble carriage. Observe
the diamond hoop upon his little finger, and the
circling hair upon his upper lip! Is he not a
magnificent
specimen of the paragon of animals? For
the last six hours he has been the observed of all
observers, the presiding genius of the place, and
his flirtation with a certain meek, blue-eyed
quakeress
,
at the Union, who, for his
dear
sake, is in
imminent danger of being read out of meeting, has
created the first positive
sensation
of the season.
The duke is
reported
to be immensely richthe lady
is
known
to be so.
The form of Hercules affects the sylphs.
But who is that mild, intellectual-looking being,
languishing in the shade? She is leaning upon the
arm of General , and talking to Chancellor .
That lady, I mean, attired in the plain white dress,
with her hair modestly parted on her forehead
she of the smiling lip and speaking eye
That looks not like the inhabitants o' the earth,
And yet is on't.
Oh, I seeMiss . I
should
have known her
among ten thousand, for she is an ornament to her
sex and country.
What a contrast she presents to the proud, haughty
belle in her train, half buried beneath the weight
of gold and jewels!
Disdain and scorn ride sparkling in her eyes.
Heavens, how she tosses her pretty head, and gives
the nod of recognition to those around her!
The wealth of worlds is heaped on her in vain.
Lady, for all your smiles and winning ways, I do
not envy the poor youth who wears your chains;
they are woven of any thing but flowers. She has
the riches of Crsus, the beauty of Hebebut the
temper of Xantippe. Yet mind, dear Theodore, I tell
you this in confidence, so don't let it go any further.
But what have we next? generals and judges,
and public characters by the score! A whole bevy
of widows, old maids, and solitary spinsters, without
any particular claim to distinction.
A sudden pause in the crowd. Several carriages
with their out-riders have rolled up to the door,
emblazoned with the crests of the nobility of this
democratic land! I cannot admire the horses
sufficiently; but as for those who have just
alighted
the
least said the soonest mended.
The bell rings for supperso, ladies and
gentlemen
,
by your leave.
Is it not strange that the very things to which
this village is indebted for all its consequence,
are most neglected? The hotels are spaciousthe
accommodations convenient, and the attendance
unexceptionable
;
but the springs themselves are in a
shocking condition. Instead of splendid colonnades,
attractive apartments, spacious pump-rooms, marble
counters, sparkling fountains, and neat, well-dressed
women to attend the visiters, as in other
countries
,
you are compelled to stand ankle-deep in the
mud, or upon a miserable platform, constructed over
a filthy brook, and receive the water from a
bare-footed
,
meanly-clad juvenile, who dips it up in an
unclean vessel, and flings it at you with a sleight of
hand peculiarly his own. In stead of taking the
water as an inviting, health-restoring beverage, you
seize the glass with a wry face and an involuntary
shudder, and drain its contents with the same
repugnance you entertain for nauseous medicine.
On rainy days, invalids cannot go to the springs,
unless they are satisfied to have the outer as well as
inner man, most thoroughly drenched, as there is no
friendly covering to shield them from the weather.
Really this is too bad, for the most fashionable
watering-place in America.
LETTER TWO.
E
The million flit as gay
As if created only like the fly
That spreads his motley wings in th' eye of noon,
To sport their season, and be seen no more.
Cowper
.
Admire, exalt, despise, laugh, weepfor here
There is such matter for all feelingMan,
Thou pendulum betwixt a smile and tear.
Byron
.
Nature hath framed strange fellows in her time.
Shakspeare
.
Congress-Hall, Saratoga
,
July
1833.
Dear Theodore
The tides of fashion, like those
of the sea, are constantly in motion: no sooner does
one wave recede than another advances; and so
at the Springs, as one carriage passes away with
its light-hearted occupants, another arrives at the
gate; and there stands mine host of the Congress,
ever ready to
Welcome the comingspeed the parting guest.
The hasty farewell is scarcely spoken, before the
new arrival engrosses all the attention; and your
mineral-water companion of yesterday vanishes
from your memory, to make room for some new
acquaintance of to-day, who, in his turn, is also
doomed to mingle with the misty recollections of
the past, and, in a brief period, to be forgotten
forever
.
Friendships formed here are fleeting and
evanescent. Excitement is the grand object of
pursuit
;
and how can people be so unreasonable as to
expect those to
feel
, who never have leisure to
think?
Nearly every house in the village is overflowing,
and visitors are still coming. I shall not attempt
to give you a particular description of all the
individuals
I have encountered here; and for ten
thousand
reasons, three of which, however, will suffice at
the present time. In the first place, I have no idea
of manufacturing a book of travels during this hot
weather. In the second, (mark what an eye I have
for business,) most of the people here are subscribers
to the Mirror, and I never take any liberties with
them, you know. And lastly, and to conclude,
those who are not subscribers, (if any such there
be!) cannot be supposed worthy of either the time
or the trouble. Yet, dear Theodore, if you will
take a chair with me in the drawing-room, (you
had a glimpse at the piazza in my last,) I will point
out a few characters from among the company here
assembled, and tell you all I know about them.
This may amuse you till the bell rings. Come, we
will say nothing to wound the feelings of any body;
for scandal, I am aware, is your abhorrence; yet
it is very fashionable at most watering-places, and
I have heard sufficient here to last me the rest of
my life-time.
You observe that mild, matronly-looking lady,
near the window yonder? Is she not a pattern of
neatness and propriety? Her story must be an
interesting
one, and not destitute of a moral. I wish
I knew it all. I remember her from my boyhood, and
shall never forget her looks one fine Sunday
morning
,
as she entered Trinity church, leaning on the
arm of poor . I never saw any thing more
beautiful than she, at that moment, appeared to my
inexperienced eyes; all my after dreams of female
loveliness were associated with her. I could not
imagine a being more perfect; but I was very young
then, and she was engaged to be married. I saw
her again, after I had grown to be a man; but oh,
how altered! She was still single.  and she
had some misunderstanding, and he had gone to
England, and died there, I think  told me. I
never heard any further particulars. Still she was
much admired for her beauty, and beloved for her
gentleness; and, as she was immensely rich, must
have had opportunities enough of forming what
is generally understood, a convenient alliance;
for men, or I am much mistaken, were as
wordly-given
formerly as now. I never saw her afterward,
until we met the other day at these Springs. There
are more old maids in the world than remain so from
necessity.
No American should wish to trace his ancestry
further back than the revolutionary war, says
a recent writer. I admire this sentiment. Yet,
while I disapprove, most heartily, of the
conceited
airs and flimsy pretensions which certain little
people arrogate to themselves on account of their
birth-right, I cannot subscribe to one particle of the
cant I am in the habit of hearing expressed on these
subjects. It is
not
the same thing, to
me
, at least,
whether my father was a count or a coal-heaver, a
prince or a pickpocket. I would have all my
relations
,
past, present, and
to come
, good and
respectable
people, and should prefer the blood of the
Howards to that of the convicts of Botany Bay
nor do I believe I am at all singular in these
particulars
.
It is nothing more than a natural feeling.
Still I would not think ill of a man on account of
any misfortune that may have attended his birth,
nor well of a man simply because he happened to
be cradled in the lap of affluence and pride. The
E*
first may be one of nature's noblemen, and the other a
poor creature, notwithstanding all his splendour; and
that this frequently happens, every day's experience
affords us abundant testimony. That the claims of
all to distinction should rest upon one's own
individual
talents, deportment, and character, is also sound
doctrine, and cannot be disputed: yet this is no
reason why we should not have an honest and
becoming
pride in the genius, integrity, or gallant
bearing of those from whom we sprung. Now,
yonder stands a gentleman, who, in my humble
judgment, cannot but indulge a secret glow of
satisfaction
,
while contemplating the roots of his family
tree. He came from a good stockthe old Dutch
settlers of New-Amsterdamthan which no blood
that flows in the human veins is either purer, better,
or braver. His forefathers were eminently
conspicuous
as Christians, soldiers, and sages; they
occupied the high places of honour and authority
were the ornaments of their day and generation;
and, notwithstanding the shade of ridicule which a
popular writer has cast around and interwoven with
their history, their memories will ever be cherished
until virtue ceases to be an attribute of the human
mind. The public-spirit of this gentleman and his
liberal views have long been the theme of universal
praise; and although I have not his personal
acquaintance
,
I know he
must
be a gentlemanthe
mild and benignant expression of his facehis
unassuming habitshis bland and courteous
demeanour
,
all bespeak it; and, to use the language of
Queen Elizabeth, are unto him letters of
recommendation
throughout the world.
That gentleman is one of the few Americans who
combine a literary taste with indefatigable business
habits. Had he devoted his life to letters instead
of merchandise, he would have been conspicuous
among the most gifted of his countrymen. I heard
him deliver an address once, remarkable for the
beauty of its style and the soundness of its doctrines.
But this is a money-making land; and Mr. ,
like Halleck, Wetmore, Sprague, Strong and others,
has found the counting-house more profitable than
the muses' templehis account-book more certain
than all books besidesand bank-notes the very best
notes in the universe.
Young  is famous for his flute, his dog, and
the number of his servants. He never travels
without
half a dozen. One he dresses in livery, and has
him always within calling distance. He plays the
German flute with great unction, and with a most
determined air, and keeps an enormous dog, of a
very peculiar breed, constantly at his heels. He
lodges at  hotel, near the top of the house
that apartment having been assigned him on account
of his musical propensitieshe not wishing to be
interrupted in his studies, and the landlord desiring
to have the neighbourhood disturbed as little as
possible
by his eternal noise. He is the horror of the
surrounding country; and complaints have frequently
been lodged against him for annoying quiet,
well-disposed
citizens throughout the day, and keeping
them awake during most of the night. Wherever he
goes he pays double board, as all
fluting
gentlemen
undoubtedly ought to do, and therefore enjoys a kind
of privilege to blow away as loud and as often as he
thinks proper. His man in livery answers his bell,
which is everlastingly going. At the first stroke of
the hammer away runs John, and away runs the
dog close behind him. It is curious to see these
two worthies hurrying up stairs, and the exhibition
never fails to create a laugh throughout the building,
which, however amusing to the spectators, is a source
of the deepest mortification and changrin to poor
John, who is the butt of all his associates in the
kitchen on this account. John has long looked upon
himself as an injured and most unfortunate man, and
once summoned sufficient resolution to remonstrate
with his master upon his grievancestelling him,
with tears in his eyes, and in a heart-rending
manner
,
that if the dog was not discharged, he should
be compelled, however reluctantly, and
notwithstanding
the high wages, to look out for another
situation, as it was quite impossible to say, when
the bell rung, which was wanted, the dog or himself.
It is entirely out of the question to describe the
indignation
of Monsieur Flute, on hearing this
complaint
.
At first he turned all the colours of the
rainbowthen arose from his seat, eyed his
rebellious
valet from head to foot, and tried to give vent
to his passion in a stream of words; but, finding the
effort vain, he promptly kicked him out of the room,
and commanded him from his presence forever!
John, however, is a prudent fellow, and knows the
value of a good place and high wages, or, to use his
own phrase, which side his bread is buttered
so he concluded to retain his place, in defiance of
the laugh and the kicking, and still remains in his
former service, and is still followed by that
everlasting
dog. Now, young  is a nuisance, and
so are his servants, and so are all
private
servants at
public hotels. During meals, they are always in the
way. You are liable to mistake them for the regular
waiters of the house, and issue your orders
accordingly
.
These they refuse to obey, of course. This
is provoking. Then they seize upon all the choice
dishes on the table, to convey them to their masters,
who sit gormandizing while your plate is empty, and
the dinner is getting cold. This is monstrous. Then
the man with a servant sometimes gives himself airs
to the man without a servant. This is intolerable.
I have heard of one or two duels on account of
private servants, and therefore I repeat, they are a
nuisance in a moral point of view, and ought to be
abated.
There is a knot of politiciansthe great
hereafter
and his distinguished colleagues, whom I
must not mention, for fear of entering the dreaded
arena of politicsnear them are descendants of
Carroll, Clinton, Tompkins, and other renowned
men,
Whose names are with their country's woven;
and the room is filling with beauties, belles and
beaux of all descriptions. The gentleman in a drab
coat, is quite a famous fellow herea member of
the temperance societiestemperate in every thing
but water, of which he drinks twenty tumblers every
morning before breakfast at the Congress Spring, and
has done so for the last six summers. He is a firm
believer in its efficacydelivers long orations on the
subject to any person who will listen to himpulls
every new comer by the button, as soon as he enters
the premises, and is known and avoided by the name
of the Water King. That little girl in black,
who snaps her fingers at the slender buck in
whiskers
,
has refused six offers of marriage within the
last twelve days. She is certainly a bewitching
creature, and often puts me in mind of Clara Fisher
in the Country Girl.
Ah, ha! my little Frenchman! That fellow is a
character. I will tell you a story about him. I
stopped at West Point, not long since, and found
the hotel crowded with visitors. It was late in the
evening when I arrived, and being almost worn out
with the fatigue of my journey, for I had been the
inmate of stage-coaches, railroad-cars, and
canalboats
without closing my eyes for the last two days, I
repaired, with all convenient haste, to the solitary
couch that had been assigned me in the
basement-story
,
in the hope of passing a few comfortable hours
in the arms of Morpheus; but one glance at the
blue chamber below, convinced me of the utter
folly of any such expectation. I found it nearly
crammed with my fellow-lodgers, who, if I might
judge from the melancholy display of hats, boots,
socks, and other articles of wearing apparel,
scattered
over the floor, in most admired disorder,
had evidently retired with unbecoming eagerness to
secure their places to themselves, and thereby guard
them against the possibility of intrusion from others;
doubtless believing, that in this, as well as in similar
cases, possession is nine points in the law. As the
apartment was very confined, and all the inhabitants
wide awake, I thought I might as well spend an
hour or two in the open air before going to bed, and
was about to retire for that purpose, when a voice
called, If you do not wish to lose your berth, you
had better turn in. Observing that nearly all the
cots, sofas, settees, chairs, etc., were occupied, and
hearing that several of my fellow-passengers were
sleeping on the house top and in the halls, I deemed
it prudent to follow the advice just given me, so
at once commenced disrobing, and was soon stowed
away in a snug corner, and it was not long before I
found myself gradually and imperceptibly sinking
under the power of the gentle god. I began to
congratulate
myselfto commiserate the unhappy
condition
of my less fortunate companions, and to bid
good night to all my cares, when that short, thin,
merry little Frenchman came dancing into the room,
and, after cutting a pigeon-wing or two, humming a
passage from a favourite opera, and skipping once
or twice around the vacant beds, sat himself upon
the most commodious, with the exclamation, Ah
ha! I find himthis is himnumber ten,
magnifique
!
Now I shall get some leetle sleeps at last.
Again humming a part of a tune, he proceeded to
prepare himself for bed. After divesting himself
of his apparel, and carefully depositing his trinkets
and watch under his pillow, he fastened a red
bandanna
handkerchief around his head, and slid
beneath
the counterpane, as gay and lively as a cricket.
It is superb, he once more exclaimed aloud; I
have not had some rest for six dozen days,
certainement
and
now I shall have some leetle sleeps. But,
waiter, bawled he, suddenly recollecting himself.
John came at the call. What is it o'clock, eh?
Nearly ten, sir.
What time de boat arrive?
About two.
When he do come, you shall wake me some
leetle minute before?
Yes, sir.
And you shall get some of de champaign and
oystare all ready for my suppare?
Very well, sir. You may depend upon me, sir,
said John, as he shut the door, and made his exit.
F
Ah,
trs bien
, and now for de leetle sleeps.
Uttering which, he threw himself upon the pillow,
and, in a few seconds, was in a delightful doze.
The foregoing manuvres and conversation had
attracted the attention of all, and aroused me
completely
.
Confound that Frenchman! growled a bluff old
fellow next him, as he turned on the other side, and
went to sleep.
Most of the other gentlemen, however, raised their
heads for a moment, to see what was going on, and
then deposited them as before, in silent resignation.
But one individual, with more nerves than fortitude,
bounced out of bed, dressed himself in a passion,
swore there was no such thing as sleeping there, and
went out of the room in a huff. This exploit had
an electric effect upon the melancholy spectators,
and a general laugh, which awoke all the basement
story, was the result. For some minutes afterward
the merriment was truly appalling. Jokes, mingled
with complaints, were heard in every direction, and
the uproar soon became universal. Silence,
however
,
was at length restored; but all symptoms of
repose had vanished with the delusion that gave them
birth. The poor Frenchman, however, whose
slumbers
had been sadly broken by the nervous man,
had turned himself upside down, and had actually
gone to sleep once more! He began to breathe hard,
and, finally, to snoreand
such
a snore!it was
enough to have awakened the dead! There was no
such thing as standing
that
. The equanimity of his
immediate neighboura drowsy fellow, who, on first
lying down, said he was resolved to sleep in spite
of thunderwas the first to give way. He sprang
bolt upright, hastily clapt both hands over his ears,
and called out, at the top of his compass, for the
Frenchman to discontinue that diabolical and
dreadful
noise. Up jumped the red nightcap, rubbing
its eyes in mute astonishment. After hearing the
heavy charge against it, with a countenance more
in sorrow than in anger, and making every apology
in its power for the unintentional outrage it had
committed
,
down it sunk once more upon the pillow,
and glided away into the land of Nod. But new
annoyances awaited my poor Frenchman; for
scarcely
had this event happened, when the door was flung
open, and in came a gentleman from Cahawba, with
a fierce-looking broad-brimmed hat upon his
pericranium
,
that attracted general attention, and struck
awe and consternation to the hearts of all beholders.
He straddled himself into the middle of the floor,
thrust both hands into his breeches pockets, pressed
his lips firmly together, and cast his eyes deliberately
around the apartment, with the expression of one
who intended to insist upon his rights.
Which is number ten? he demanded, in a tone
which startled all the tenants of the basement story.
Ah, I perceive! continued he, approaching the
Frenchman, and laying violent hands upon him.
There's some mistake here. A man in my bed, hey?
Well, let us see what he's made of. Look here,
stranger, you're in the wrong box! You've tumbled
into my bedso you must shift your quarters.
Who shall depict the Frenchman's countenance,
as he slowly raised his head, half opened his drooping
organs of vision, and took an oblique squint at the
gentleman from Cahawba!
You are in the wrong bed, repeated he of the
hatnumber ten is my property; yonder is yours,
so have the politeness just to hop out.
The Frenchman was resigned to his fate, and
gathering himself together, transported his mortal
remains to the vacant bed, without the slightest
resistance
,
and in eloquent silence. It was very evident
to him, as well as the rest of us, that there was no
withstanding the persuasions of his new
acquaintance
,
who had a fist like a mallet, and who swore
that he always carried loaded pistols in his pocket,
to be ready for any emergency. The inhabitants
of the basement would have screamed outright this
time, but for prudential considerations, for the
gentleman
from Cahawba realized the description of
the determined dog, mentioned in the comedy,
who lived next door to a churchyard, killed a man
a day, and buried his own dead. Was this, then,
a man to be trifled with? Certainly not. Better to
cram the sheets down your throat, and run the risk
of suffocation from suppressed laughter, than to
encounter
the displeasure of a person who wears
such
a hat. They are always to be avoided.
But to return to the Frenchman. He was no
sooner in his new resting-place, than John came to
inform him that his champaign and oysters were
ready. Like one in a dream he arose, sat upon the
side of the bed, and slowly dressed himself, without
a single murmur at his great disappointment. He
had hardly finished, when the steamboat bell
sounded
among the highlands, and he received the
gratifying
intelligence, that in consequence of the time
he had lost in dressing, he had none left to eat his
F*
supperand that, if he did not hurry, he would be
too late for the boat! At this, he aroseyawned
stretched his person out at full length, and, with the
ejaculationI shall get some leetle sleeps nevare
bid us good-night, and slowly took his leave.
LETTER THREE.
I drankI liked it not.
Prior
.
Care is no cure, but rather corrosive
For things that are not to be remedied.
Shakspeare
.
I shall the effect of this good lesson keep
As watchman to my heart.
Shakspeare
.
Saratoga
,
August
, 1833.
Early
rising, active exercise, country air, and
the Congress Spring have done, are doing, and will
continue to do wonders for invalids. They are all
excellent in their way; but to produce a beneficial
effect upon weak nerves and debilitated constitutions,
they must be enjoyed in moderation. Nothing is
more true than that all excess is hurtful; and
nothing
,
one would suppose, is more self-evident: yet
many people in delicate health go to Saratoga
under the impression, it would seem, that the more
water they drink, the faster they will get well.
Some of the visitors are in the habit of swallowing
fifteen, twenty, thirty, and even forty glasses every
morning before breakfast! The result of such
imprudence
can, of course, be easily foreseen. Instead
of getting the better of their several complaints, they
daily grow worse, and are not unfrequently
compelled
to abandon the use of the waters altogether, for
want of proper caution in the first instance. The
resident physician at the Springs, as every body
knows, is an able practitioner, a man of science, and
a well-bred gentleman. We were seated one morning,
during the present season, in his study, when an
individual knocked at the door, and immediately
gained admittance. He was a large, fat, unwieldy
piece of humanity from the south, with a face like
the full moon just rising, and had the appearance of
one who could kill an ox with his fist, and pick his
teeth with its horns. But, alas! appearances are
deceitful; my man mountain was sadly out of
repair
,
and could do no such thing. A chronic affection
of his stomach embittered all his days, and his
doctor
had sent him to the Springs for relief. Every
other remedy had been tried, but to little or no
purpose
.
The waters then were his only reliance, his
last resort. If they failed him, his case was
hopeless
his
disease incurable. Accordingly, on his
arrival, he had taken to hard drink, like a brave
fellow; but finding, to his unutterable astonishment
and confusion, after a whole week's melancholy
experience, that the mineral fluids had done him an
infinite deal of mischief, and not the least discernible
good, he had now repaired to the apartment of the
resident physician, entirely out of humour with the
waters, himself, and all the world besides, and in
utter despair. No wonder, then, that he was angry,
or that he should frown indignantly on coming into
the presence of the learned professor of the healing
art. Placing his cane against the wall, in a firm
and decided manner, and tossing his hat upon the
table with a peculiar emphasis, he threw himself
into a chair with a thumping whack; then taking
a blue and white handkerchief from his pocket, he
wiped the perspiration from his face, crossed his
legs, folded his arms, compressed his lips, and eyed
the doctor from head to foot, with mingled feelings
of scorn and indignation.
So, said he, at length, you're a doctor, are
you?
At your service, sir. May I ask who you are?
Oh, certainly, I am a man that has come six
hundred miles, like a blockhead, in compliance with
the advice of a quack-doctor, to drink your
infernal
watersand they've made me worsethat's
who I am. Now, what do you say to that, hey?
Why, replied the doctor, with his usual
good-nature
,
and without allowing himself to be disturbed
in the least, by the abrupt deportment of his new
acquaintance, why, my friend, that I am very sorry
for it. But what's the matter with you?
Oh, sir, I'm in pain all over.
Indeed; what are your symptoms?
I've every symptom you ever heard of.
That's bad.
Bad! said the man with a stomach, it's
infernal
it's
diabolicalit will be the death of me!
In pain all over, you say?
Yes, all over, I tell you!
Any pain in your foot?
Well, I don't exactly know as to that, said the
gentleman from the south, evidently drawing in his
horns.
If you had any there, would you not be likely
to know it? pursued the doctor, mildly.
Well, I suppose I should.
Then, you have no pain in your foot?
Why, no.
Then, what do you mean by pain all over?
The patient would have explained; but the
doctor
went on with his professional cross-examination.
And how many tumblers of water do you drink
a day?
Why, I began moderately. When I first came
I only took eight; but I have increased the quantity
every-day, and, this morning I got down thirty-two.
G
Thirty-two? repeated the doctor, coolly, but
with evident surprise. Only thirty-two? Then
permit me, my friend, to remark that you have not
taken
The man from the south interrupted himhe
would hear no morehe thought the doctor was
going
to tell him he had not taken half enoughand
the idea made him shudder.
Now stop, doctor; stop, I beseech you. That's
all very true, what you're going to say. I know it.
If I must die, I must; but I can't drink more than
thirty-two tumblers, any way under heavensnor
will I attempt it, happen what may!
It is unnecessary to give the remainder of the
dialogue. The reader has sufficient to show him
with what views some people visit the Springs, and
how little they know of the properties and effects of
the waters. This, however, is only one of a thousand
similar instances. The invalid in questionfor such
he really was, notwithstanding his enormous bulk
and jolly round physiognomywas soon convinced
of the absolute absurdity of the course he had been
pursuing; and, after listening to a little salutary
advice
,
which, we make no doubt, will be of service
to him during the remainder of his life, took his
leave, with the resolution to become a more
temperate
man in future. We saw him again, about a
fortnight after the conversation here recorded, and
were gratified to learn, that, by following a few
simple directions, his pain all over had entirely
disappeared, and that he was a new creature, or, to
use his own expression, as good as new. He
looked the picture of perfect health, and said he felt
as well as he looked.
Then you have changed your opinion of the
waters?
Entirely. They have acted upon me like a
charm. But no man should touch them, until he
has first received the advice and directions of some
competent physician.
True, and this simple fact it would do no harm
for all to bear in mind who visit the Springs.
A LETTER AND A POEM.
He turned him from the spothis home no more,
For without hearts there is no home;and felt
The solitude of passing his own door
Without a welcome.
Byron
.
G*
New-York
,
February
1, 1837.
My dear sir
You did me the honour to request
some lines of mine for musick; and, at the moment,
being delighted with your fine voice and exquisite
taste in singing, I said I would write you a song.
Now, I think with the author of the Hunchback, that
a promise given, when it can be kept, admits not of
release, save by consent or forfeiture of those who
hold it, and I have been as good as my word, as you
will perceive by the enclosure of The Woodman.
I hope it will answer your purpose. Let me tell you
how I came to choose an old tree for my subject.
Riding out of town a few days since, in company
with a friend, who was once the expectant heir of
the largest estate in America, but over whose worldly
prospects a blight has recently come, he invited me
to turn down a little romantick woodland pass not
far from Bloomingdale.
Your object? inquired I.
Merely to look once more at an old tree planted
by my grandfather, near a cottage that was once my
father's.
The place is yours then? said I.
No, my poor mother sold it; and I observed a
slight quiver of the lip, at the recollection of that
circumstance
.
Dear mother! resumed my
companion
,
we passed many happy, happy days, in that
old cottage; but it is nothing to me nowfather,
mother, sisters, cottageall, all, gone; and a
paleness
overspread his fine countenance, and a moisture
came to his eyes as he spoke. But after a moment's
pause, he added, Don't think me foolish; I don't
know how it is, I never ride out but I turn down
this lane to look at that old tree. I have a thousand
recollections about it, and I always greet it as a
familiar
and well-remembered friend. In the by-gone
summer-time it was a friend indeed. I often listened
to the good counsel of my parents there, and I have
had
such
gambols with my sisters! Its leaves are
all off now, so you won't see it to half its advantage,
for it is a glorious old fellow in summer; but I like it
full as well in very winter time. These words
were scarcely uttered, when my companion cried
out, There it is! and he sprang from his saddle
and ran toward it. I soon overtook him, wondering
at his haste; but what met my sight, made it no
wonder. Near the tree stood an old man with his
coat off, sharpening an axe. He was the occupant
of the cottage.
What are you doing?
What's that to you, was the reply.
A little matter, but not muchyou're not going
to cut that tree down surely?
Yes, but I am though, said the woodman.
What for, inquired my companion, almost
choked with emotion.
What for? why, because I think proper to do
so. What for? I like that! Well, I'll tell you what
for; this tree makes my dwelling unhealthy; it
stands too near the house; prevents the moisture
from exhaling, and renders us liable to
fever-and-ague
.
Who told you that?
Dr. Smith.
Have you any other reason for wishing to cut it
down?
Yes, I am getting old, the woods are a great way
off, and this tree is of some value to me to burn.
He was soon convinced, however, that the story
about the fever-and-ague was a mere fiction, for there
never had been a case of that disease in the
neighbourhood
;
and then was asked what the tree was
worth for firewood?
Why, when it is down about ten dollars.
Suppose I should give you that sum, would you
let it stand?
Yes.
You are sure of that?
Positive.
Then give me a bond to that effect.
I drew it up; it was witnessed by his daughter,
the money was paid, and we left the place, with an
assurance from the young girl, who looked as smiling
and beautiful as a Hebe, that the tree should stand
as long as she lived. We returned to the turnpike,
and pursued our ride. These circumstances made
a strong impression upon my mind, and furnished
me with the materials for the song I send you. I
hope you will like it, and pardon this long and
hurried letter. With sentiments of respect, I remain
yours very cordially,
Geo. P. Morris.
Henry Russell, Esq
.
Woodman
, spare that tree!
Touch not a single bough!
In youth it sheltered me,
And I'll protect it now.
'Twas my forefather's hand
That placed it near his cot;
There, woodman let it stand,
Thy axe shall harm it not!
That old familiar tree,
Whose glory and renown
Are spread o'er land and sea,
And wouldst thou hack it down?
Woodman, forbear thy stroke!
Cut not its earth-bound ties;
Oh, spare that aged oak,
Now towering to the skies!
When but an idle boy
I sought its grateful shade;
In all their gushing joy
Here too my sisters played.
My mother kiss'd me here;
My father pressed my hand
Forgive this foolish tear,
But let that old oak stand!
My heart-strings round thee cling,
Close as thy bark, old friend!
Here shall the wild-bird sing,
And still thy branches bend.
Old tree! the storm still brave!
And, woodman, leave the spot;
While I've a hand to save,
Thy axe shall harm it not.
LEAVES
FROM
AN EDITOR'S PORTFOLIO.
H
A thing of shreds and patches.
Shakspeare
.
GROUNDS FOR A DIVORCE.
And Lovewhich, on their bridal eve,
Had promised long to stay
Forgot his promisetook French leave,
And bore his lamp away.
Halleck
.
Charles
Twas married a few years ago.
He was a happy man. His business was a thriving
one, and he snapped his fingers, and said he did not
care a fig for the presidents, cashiers and directors
of all the banks in Christendom, for he owed them
nothing; and was not obliged to bow, and stoop, and
cringe to them for a discount, as many do
now-a-days
,
until it is quite impossible to stand erect in
the presence of an honest man. He had a house in
Broadway, near the Bowling-Green, and lived more
like a nabob than well becomes a decent republican
in this democratick country. His wife had been a
belle and a beauty; but, like many others of her sex,
she had a will of her own, which she did not lay
aside with her bridal garments. Everybody envied
Charles his good fortune. Matters went on
swimmingly
.
Charles was a high fellowfond of his
friendsfond of his horsesfond of his dogsand
fond of having his way in everything. He liked
companyfrequently gave parties at his own house,
and attended balls, routs and soirees at those of his
neighbours. He was, in short, a fine, gay, dashing
sparkfull of health and spirits, and in the very
bloom of life. Yet, with all his good qualities,
Charles Thad one fault, which his wife
endeavoured
in vain to correct. He would
occasionally
stay out until midnight; and, whenever this
occurred, Mrs. T met him at the threshold
of his own door, with chidings and complaints.
Now, Mr. T had a touch of Gloster's
condition
,
which could not brook the spirit of reproof;
so that the course his wife took to remedy the defect
in his character, only made matters worseand
discontent
and family bickerings were the result;
frequent
wranglings followed, and an open rupture
finally ensued; consequently, in process of time,
both husband and wife grew heartily tired of each
other. One day a grand entertainment was given at
the Astor house, in honour of a distinguished
senator
.
Charles T, of course attended. The
dinner was excellentthe speeches eloquentthe
wines sparkling, and the company even more
sparkling
than the wine. Charles did not go home that
night at all, but arrived at his own door just as St.
Paul's clock struck the hour of four. The morning
was drear and cold. Not a light was to be seen
not a footstep to be heardthe watchmen were
turned in and the gas-lamps were turned out; and,
more dismal still, the door of Mr. T's
dwelling
was locked! This had never happened before;
and Charles's patriotism gave way to his petulance.
He pulled most lustily at the bellhe broke the
wirehe dashed the handle on the pavement; but
no one answered his summons. He addressed
himself
to the knockerrap, rap, r-a-p, and repeated;
r-a-p, rap, r-r-a-a-p-p, and again repeated;
but all in vain. The inmates were either asleep, or
deadit was not certain which; but it was certain
that no one came to his relief. It was striking five
o'clock; and an old dunghill cock, in an adjacent
stable, had thrice done salutation to the dawn.
The musical timepiece, on the marble mantel in the
front room of his own house, was playing the
popular
air of How brightly breaks the morningbut
no friendly hand withdrew the bolt that kept him
from his bed. This was too bad. Rap, rap, rap,
went the knocker once more, and louder than ever.
Up flew the windows of almost every house in the
neighbourhood, except his ownand out shot various
night-caps and bandanas to inquire what the deuse
was the matter? Charles endeavoured to explain,
when, with a bitter reproof for disturbing people in
their virtuous beds, and for waking them out of their
innocent sleep at such unreasonable hours, down
went the sashes, andpresto!the night-caps and
bandanas disappeared in less time than you could say
Jack Robinson! Charles was boiling over with rage.
He tried the window-shutters, the cellar-door, and the
grate to the coal-vault, but all to no purpose. Finally,
a thought struck him, and he resolved to scale the
garden-wall
.
He repaired to the rear of the house with
that intention. While clambering over the bricks,
he was arrested by one of the guardians of the night,
who had awakened from a delicious nap, just in the
nick of time to seize him by the leg and bear him
away to the watch-house. Here he remained until
day-break, when he was dismissed by Mr. Justice
Lownds, with an admonition to keep better hours in
future! How the lady explained the matterhow
it happened that none of the household heard the
bell and knockerand why a night-latch was added
soon after to the front-door, are matters that we
know nothing about; and, if we did, they are not
worth recording here. We pass over these and other
uninteresting particulars for the sake of brevity, and
H*
leave the reader to account for a mysterious
advertisement
which has recently been published in the
Albany Argus, wherein it is set forth that a certain
very ill-used lady claims to be divorced from her
husband, on the grounds that he is given to late hours
and bad company!
WANT OF CONFIDENCE.
A little Frenchman loaned a merchant five
thousand
dollars when the times were good. He called
at the counting-house a few days since, in a state of
agitation not easily described.
How do you do? inquired the merchant.
Sickver sick, replied monsieur.
What's the matter?
De times is de matter.
Detimes?
what disease is that?
De malaide vat break all de marchants, ver
much.
Ahthe times, eh?well, they are bad, very
bad, sure enough; but how do they affect you?
Vy, monsieur, I lose de confidance.
In whom?
In everybody.
Not in me, I hope?
Pardonnez moi, monsieur; but I do not know
who to trust  present, when all de marchants break
several times, all to pieces.
Then I presume you want your money?
Oui, monsieur, I starve for want of
l'argent
.
Can't you do without it?
No, monsieur, I must have him.
You must?
Oui, monsieur, said little dimity breeches,
turning pale with apprehension for the safety of his
money.
And you can't do without it?
No, monsieur, not von other leetle moment
longare.
The merchant reached his bank bookdrew a
check on the good old Chemical for the amount, and
handed it to his visiter.
Vat is dis, monsieur?
A check for five thousand dollars, with the
interest
.
Is it bon? said the Frenchman, with
amazement
.
Certainly.
Have you
de l'argent
in de bank?
Yes.
And it is parfaitement convenient to pay de
sum?
Undoubtedly. What astonishes you?
Vy, dat you have got him in dees times.
Oh, yes, and I have plenty more. I owe
nothing
that I cannot pay at a moment's notice.
The Frenchman was perplexed.
Monsieur, you shall do me one leetle favour, eh?
With all my heart.
Vell, monsieur, you shall keep
de l'argent
for me
some leetle year longer.
Why, I thought you wanted it.
Tout au contraire
. I no vant
de l'argent
I vant
de grand confidance. Suppose you no got de money,
den I vant him ver muchsuppose you got him, den
I no vant him at all.
Vous comprenez
, eh?
After some further conference, the little
Frenchman
prevailed upon the merchant to retain the
money
,
and left the counting-house with a light heart
and a countenance very different from the one he
wore when he entered. His confidence was
restored
,
and although he did not stand in need of
the money, he wished to know that his property was
in safe hands.
This little sketch has a moral, if the reader has
sagacity enough to find it out.
EFFECTS OF INTERRUPTION.
Guido
had painted a picture that astonished all
Florence. It rested upon his easel. It was
pronounced
his
chef-d'uvre
. It was almost perfect.
Everybody came to seeto admireto praise it.
How glorious! said one.
It has never been excelled! said another.
What atmospherewhat vitality! said a third.
And why don't the group of peasants speak?
said a fourth.
A slight defect was observed in the face of one
of them, which was a portrait taken from life.
Guido was alone. He sat about remedying the
defect. He had mixed the coloursthe brush had
touched the canvasshe was full of the idea of
making the picture not almost, but altogether
perfect
, and a bland smile irradiated his fine
countenance
when
an officer entered his studio and
arrested him for debt. Guido rose from his seat
and dashed the brush at the unoffending canvass!
The picture was ruined for ever!
What a fretful fool was Guido! said one.
How irritable! said another.
What a dunce to get into a passion because he
was interrupted! said a third.
How silly to spoil in a moment the labour of a
year! said a fourth.
He is not constructed like other men, and is a
fool, said they all.
Do you paint, friends? asked a bystander.
No, was the reply.
Then you know nothing of the workings of the
mind of an artist, nor can you feel the withering
disappointment he endures when, just as he is giving
the last touch to a production that is to bring him
fame and competence, his golden dream is broken.
His imagination takes wings, and that which but a
moment before was the aspiration of a bright and
burning fancy, when left unfinished and resumed in
a more serious mood, becomes a mechanical and
weary drudgery. Had Guido been differently
constructed
,
had he been what you have been pleased
to call hima foolhe never would have been able
to paint the picture at all.
THE HUNCHBACK.
During
the last rehearsal of the play of the
Hunchback
,
Mr. Knowles, who personally superintended
the stage-directions, was frequently annoyed by the
remarks of the actors. Some of them very much
doubted the success of the piece. Charles Kemble
thought the part of Sir Thomas Clifford unworthy
of his talents; he consented, however, to perform
it, for his daughter's sake. This nettled Knowles,
who would not listen to a single suggestion.
Give me another entrance and exit speech,
said Kemble.
I can add nothing more, replied Knowles.
You can't? exclaimed the actor.
No! rejoined the dramatist.
Give me a few words here, said the first.
Not a line, said Knowles, except it be one to
hang yourself with.
Here the parties turned from each other, and the
business of the stage went on for a few moments
longer, when it was again interrupted by Kemble:
Beg your pardon, Mr. Knowles; but this part
absolutely requires an addition: a slight alteration
would render the play far more effective. You
must
make another speech for Sir Thomas.
Knowles coloured, and, turning abruptly to the
patrician of the stage, gave vent to his feelings in
these terms:
Mr. Kemble, brains are not shingles, sir; and
And what, sir? said Kemble.
And if they were, rejoined the author, I am
no carpenter!
Kemble smiled at the oddity of the expression,
and Knowles left the theatre in a huff.
At night, the bickerings of the morning were
forgottenthe house was crowded with the beauty,
fashion and taste of the English metropolisthe
play was applauded and cheered throughoutand
the curtain fell amid the most animated applause
ever heard within the walls of a theatre. First
the author (who, in consequence of the
indisposition
of one of the actors, performed the
Hunchback
,)
was called for and made his bow; he was
received with loud and hearty cheersthen the fair
debutante
, Miss Fanny Kemble, who had made a
deep impression in the character of Julia: the pit
arose and testified their approbation, and the waving
of handkerchiefs was universal throughout the boxes
and next came Mr. Charles Kemble, who
announced
the play for repetition, amid most deafening
acclamations; and the parties retired, covered with
laurels.
Well, said Knowles, when they were out of
publick view, what alteration can you suggest
now, Mr. Kemble?
Nothing in the
text
, said Kemble; but I think
the
cast
of the piece might be improved.
Ah, there, said Knowles, I allow you to be a
better judge than myself; any suggestion of yours
is worth attending towhat is it?
Why, sir, said Kemble, intending to hit poor
Knowles in a sensitive part, I think if Master
Walter were in any other hands but your own, the
play would go off better!
Knowles looked confused, and was evidently hurt
at the remark; but he immediately rallied his spirits
and asked Kemble what fault he had to find with
his performance.
Why, sir, said Kemble, you are imperfect
in the words; and, from this circumstance, it
appears
that you do not give the true meaning of
the
author
.
This retort, strange to say, restored good feeling
between the parties; mutual concessions were
exchanged
,
and the next day all London was loud in
praise of the Hunchback!
MAJOR NOAH.
We
remember, as a thing of yesterday,
notwithstanding
many years have passed away since that
merry night, when Mr. Noah's play of
She would
be a soldier
, was first performed; when bonny Miss
Leesuggnow Mrs. Hackettlooked like a Hebe
and sung like a nightingale! She played the
principal
character; and, although a spinster then, wore
the breeches to the infinite delight and satisfaction
of everybody. Barnes was then the merriest dog
aliveSimpson was in all his glory, and Pritchard
was the
top
tragedian of the Park. We have
forgotten
who else figured on that memorable occasion;
but one thing we shall never forget; each one of the
audience, on going into the house, was presented
with a printed copy of the play. This was a sad
annoyance to the poor actors, very few of whom
I
knew their parts; and, when the curtain rose, and
they perceived that each auditor had a book before
him, they were scarcely able to articulate what little
they had committed to memory! The
embarrassment
was universal and very amusing; but, when
the audience wet their thumbs and turned over the
pages together, the effect was ludicrous in the
extreme
!
The rustling of leaves was prodigious, and
the turning of every page was the signal for shouts
of boisterous merriment. We have thought of that
night a thousand times, and laughed heartily at the
recollection of the odd things said and done by
Barnes, who was then so great a favourite that he
took all manner of liberties with the publick with
perfect impunity. The writer of this was a boy at
the time, and remembers Major Noah as the great
literary and political lion of this the greatest of all
possible great cities. He told the best story, rounded
the best sentence, and wrote the best play of all his
contemporaries. He was the life and spirit and
quotation
of all circles. As editor, critick, and author,
he was looked up to as an oracle. He was, in short,
the
idoneus homo
of that day. His wit was
everywhere
repeated, and his kindheartednesswhich,
by-the-by, to this very hour has never forsaken him
was the theme of every tongue. He was soon
afterwards
appointed sheriff, and the only reason ever
given for turning him out was, that the people
thought it
devilish
hard that a Jew should hang a
Christian! Pretty christians, forsooth! said the
facetious major in his newspaper, whose crimes
have sent them to the gallows! While in office,
Major Noah wrote several other pieces for the stage,
which were eminently successful. One of them was
so redolent of villanous saltpetre, brimstone, sulphur,
and blue and red lights, that it set fire to the theatre
and burnt it to the ground! The proceeds of that
night were for the benefit of Major Noah. The house
was filled to its utmost limits with the beauty and
fashion of the town. Oh the cheerful hearts and
radiant
faces of that merry occasion! and oh the
applause
and hilarity of all the mad wags and wits that
were present! The receipts were nearly two
thousand
dollarsa larger sum than is ever seen for the
performance of a single evening in these degenerate
days of paper currency and empty pockets. It was
an awful conflagration that succeeded however, and
it produced the greatest distress among the kings and
knights, princes and pickpockets, baronets and
banditti
,
and all the other heroes of the sock and buskin,
who lost every thing they had, and were thrown
entirely
out of employment until the opening of the
Anthony-street theatre. Their drooping fortunes were
here revived by the first appearance of Kean, that
aloe-tree of the dramatick groves, which blooms but
once in a hundred years. Major Noah's two thousand
dollars, however, were saved. Mr. Faulkner, the
treasurer, had taken the money home with him for
safe keeping, and the next day Mr. Price enclosed
it to the author. We remember the correspondence
that ensued, and we were struck with the generosity
and magnanimity of Noah, who, notwithstanding his
own pecuniary wants, and they were many at the
time, returned every fraction of the amount, and
caused it to be divided among the performers, who
had been stripped of their little all by the fire! This
noble act made a deep impression upon the mind of
the writer of this, who, after the lapse of a little
life-time
,
feels an emotion about the heart, while he
records it in these fugitive pages; thinking,
perhaps
,
that it may serve as a hint to Mr. Dunlap,
or some other historian of the stage, as raw material
for a more elaborate sketch of one who has done
much for the drama and its professors in this country.
We could tell a thousand anecdotes of the good
major
,
but we forego the pleasure for the present. The
truth is, we merely intended to refer to the fact that
a new play of his was forthcoming, and our feelings,
almost against our will, betrayed us into what has
followed. If we have given fancy the whip,
imagination
the reins, while system came limping behind,
his good nature will excuse us; and so will our
citizens
for writing about one we have known so long
and intimately, with something like a heart-glow.
THE ACTORS AND THE BROKERS.
Oh, that infernal Jacob Barker!
Some
nine years since, Barnes and Hackett, the
comedians, met in Wall-street. Barnes was in a
towering fury, for he had just heard of the loss of
some two or three thousand dollars, in consequence
of the failure of the Tradesmen's Bank, and other
little misfortunes of that kind. The following
dialogue
is authentick:
Barnes
.Hallo, Hackett! here, just step into the
Union Bank with me: I want to get my dividend.
Hackett
.With pleasure. Why, what a great
stockholder you are becoming in the banks.
Barnes
.Oh, confound them. I suppose you have
heard of my losses in the Tradesmen?
Hackett
.Yes, and am very sorry for them.
Barnes
.It's all along with that infernal Jacob
Barker!
Hackett
.Indeed.
Barnes
.Yes, I'd have that fellow hanged: but
let's go in for my dividend.
And in the comedians went together.
Barnes called on the first teller, and told him he
wanted his dividend. The first teller referred him
to the president, an old gray-headed gentleman, who
stood behind the counter.
I*
Barnes
.Called for my dividend, sir.
President
.For your what?
Barnes
.My dividend.
President
.Beg your pardon sir; but what is
your name?
Barnes
.Mr. Barnes.
Upon the avowal of this fact every clerk in the
bank turned to look at the comedian, who was
unknown
until the anouncement of his name. Upon
which there was a general titter throughout the
bank, everybody being well acquainted with old
Barnes, as he was called upon the stage.
President
.Mr. Barnes, we do not make any
dividend
for the last six months.
Barnes
.No! why, what the devil's the reason?
Prisident
.Why, haven't you heard of the forgery
on the bank, and the arrest of Redmond?
Barnes
.No; haven't heard a syllable of it; but
I want my dividend. You're not going to swindle
me out of that, I hope! Oh, that infernal Jacob
Barker!
President
.Mr. Barker has nothing to do with
this institution, Mr. Barnes, and we can't make any
dividend until we recover our late losses.
Barnes
.Then, sir, you are all a set of swindlers
beg your pardonheaven forgive me for getting
angrybut I believe you are all as bad as Jacob
Barker himselfall in the plot. No dividend, eh!
President
.No, not a cent.
Barnes
.Well, I hope my principal's safe?
President
.Certainly.
Barnes
.Well, that's better than the Tradesmen's.
Oh, that infernal Jacob Barker! Good-day, sir.
Come, Hackett.
And the parties left the bank amid the general
titter of all present. On going out Barnes turned to
Hackett:
Barnes
.Didn't I give it to that old fellow?
Hackett
.Yes, I think you did.
Barnes
.Well, there's some comfort in speaking
one's mind. Oh, that infernal Jacob Barker! I
should like to tell him my opinion.
Hackett
.What makes you so angry with Jacob
Barker?
Barnes
.Why, all these failures are owing to him.
Didn't he advise me to buy in the Tradesmen and
the Union, merely to swindle me out of my money?
I wish I could only see him now. Hollo!yonder
he goes!Hollo!Jacob Barker!here!I want
to speak to you.
Barnes and Hackett ran after him at the top of
their speed, and soon overtook the wily broker.
Barker
Why, Mr. Barnes, what's the matter?
Barnes
.Why, matter enough. How came you
to adivse me to buy stock in the Tradesman and
Union Banks?
Barker
.Why, I thought the stock good at the
time.
Barnes
.Well, one's failed and the other has had
a forgery committed upon it.
Barker
.And so you've lost your money.
Barnes
.Exactly.
Barker
.I'm sorry to hear it; but you must bear
your losses like a Christian.
Barnes
.Well, that's cool!
Barker
.Yes, Mr. Barnes, I'm always cooland
I advise you to keep so too. But I'm too busy to
waste my time with you just now. I've important
business on hand; so good-by.
Barker went on his way, leaving poor Barnes
almost
choking with rage at the remembrance of his
losses. He was absolutely too angry to utter a
syllable at the moment; but as soon as he recovered
the use of his tongue he bawled after him, at the top
of his compass
Barnes
.Good-by, old Shylock! The day you
die there'll be a man hung! Oh, that infernal Jacob
Barker!
(
Exit Barnes in a huffand Hackett convulsed with
laughter
.)
HILSON AND PAUL PRY.
It is a singular fact, but nevertheless eminently true, that of all persons,
actors in general are the worst judges of an unacted play. It was given in
evidence, before the committee of the House of Commons
anent
Dramatick
Affairs, that the plays which, by the unanimous consent of the green-room, had
been esteemed to be all that they ought to be, were, on the first night of
representation
,
almost uniformly condemned.
Sunbeam
.
We
remember, on the first announcement of Paul
Pry at the Park theatre, meeting with Hilson just
as he was coming out of the house after rehearsal.
Well, said we, what sort of a piece is Paul
Pry?
Poor stuff, said Hilson. It won't do.
How do you like your own part?
Not at allit's very heavy: I wonder how Liston
made anything of it.
What sort of a part has Barnes?
Not good.
What will Mrs. Wheatley do with Mrs. Subtle?
Nothingthe piece is bad!
Who would have thought after this, that this same
play was performed at the Park by these same
performers
Barnes
as Colonel Hardy, Hilson as Paul
Pry, and Mrs. Wheatley as Mrs. Subtle, upwards of
two hundred nights, and that it was decidedly the
most popular play ever produced at that theatre?
ORAL ANECDOTES OF WELL-KNOWN INDIVIDUALS.
When
Commodore Porter last visisted this city,
he spent much of his time at the hospitable mansion
of the late General Morton, who, as every body knows,
was a gentleman of the old school, and a man of very
agreeable wit and compliment. The walls of the
general's library were graced with various
productions
of the pencil and graver, and among them
full-length
portraits of several distinguished naval
officers
Decatur,
Bainbridge, Perry, Morris, and
others. The commodore expressed his admiration
of the fidelity and effect of these; but said they
were too large. Now, I intend to add my portrait
to your collection shortly; but it shall be done in
quite a different style.
Then you do not like these? said the general.
Not exactly, replied the commodore; there's
entirely too much canvas.
That's a very singular objection for you to
make, observed the facetious general, directing the
attention of his guest to a small picture representing
the engagement of the Essex with a frigate and a
sloop of war, off Valparaiso, which hung in one
corner of the room, a very singular objection,
indeed, when we have before us an evidence that it
will require double the usual quantity of canvas
to
take you
.
There are many good stories in circulation
respecting
our worthy fellow-citizen, Preserved Fish.
This gentleman, in early life, was a sea-captain.
One day his vessel was hailed by a brig, when the
following dialogue took place:
Ship a-hoy?
Hallo!
Who's your captain?
Preserved Fish.
Who?
Preserved Fish.
The master of the brig, thinking he was
misunderstood
,
and wondering at the stupidity of the
opposite party, again applied the trumpet to his
mouth and bawled out,
I say, mister, I don't want to know what your
cargo is; but what's your captain's n-a-m-e?
The late Major Fairlie was a marked, original and
peculiar character. When the new constitution of
this state was submitted to the people for adoption,
they were required to deposite either the word
yes
or
no
in the ballot boxes. There was no accepting
the good and rejecting the bad parts of it. No
alteration
or amendment whatever would be permitted.
It must either be taken as a whole, or not at all.
Major F. thought the new document, in many
respects
,
far preferable to the old one, but he did not
altogether fancy it as it stood. On being asked his
opinion, he said,
That instrument is like a good oyster, but it's
plaguy hard to be compelled to swallow the shells
along with it.
The pious Mr. , who, by the way, is
suspected
of being no better than he should be,
notwithstanding
all his professions, a short time since rebuked
a well-known merchant of this city for using profane
language.
Your discourse is ungentlemanly and impious,
said Mr.. You should break yourself of such
an abominable practice.
I know it, returned the dealer in cotton-bales
and profanity; but most men fall into some error
or other unknown to themselves, yet they are
entirely
innocent of all intention to do wrong,
notwithstanding
their little inaccuraciesnow I swear a
great deal, and you pray a great deal, yet neither of
us, I'm confident, means any thing by it.
When Mr. Lee was mayor of the city of
New-York
,
he happened to be in conversation with a
friend, as the omnibus, called the Gideon Lee,
rolled past.
I was aware, observed his companion, that
your honour was destined to play many conspicuous
parts in the great drama of human life; but I never
expected to see you on the
public stage!
No man in this community had a larger circle of
acquaintance than the late Doctor Hosack. He stood
in Wall-street half an hour one morning, talking
with a friend, and almost every body spoke to him
as they passed. It is incredible the number of
nods and how-d'ye-dos and how-are-yes the worthy
physician received in the short space above
mentioned
.
These, however, were so numerous as to
induce his friend to remark
Why, doctor, you appear to be pretty well known
in New-York?
Yes, replied the M. D., with a little pardonable
self-conceit, I think, if I were to commit murder,
they would find me out.
Why, yes, returned the other, except you did
it in the way of your profession!
The doctor, it is said, did not relish the joke.
Doctors are fond of ridiculing each other, and
their controversies are at times quite amusing. Now
it is well known that the practitioners of the old
K
school have a mortal antipathy to the disciples of the
new. Among your regular Galens, hompathia
is exceedingly unpopularthey scout it on all
occasions
.
A lady called on Dr. Francis, an eminent
practitioner, and an adherent of the Sangrado
system
,
with an imaginary complaint of the heart, and
was recommended by him in derision to try Dr.
Hahncmann's method. What is that? asked the
invalid. Why, madam, said he, it is a sovereign
remedy for every complaint under the sun. In your
case, I would advise you to dissolve one grain of
muriate of soda (common salt) in a hogshead of
water, and take a teaspoonful every three months.
The lady followed the advice thus given, and strange
to say, after two doses, was entirely cured of her
complaint, and recommended it to others as a specific
in all similar cases. Such is the power of the
imagination!
During the panick in the money market some
few years ago, a meeting of merchants was held in
the Exchange, to devise ways and means to
extricate
themselves from their pecuniary difficulties.
The great hall was crowded, addresses were made,
resolutions passed, committees appointed, and
everything
done that is usual and necessary. After all
this, one of the company moved that the meeting
stand adjourned until some future day, when up
jumped a little jobber, in a great state of excitement,
and requested the merchants to linger a moment, as
he had something of the greatest importance to
communicate
.
The jobber was known to be a very
diffident person; and, as he had never ventured on
the responsibilities of a speech on any former
public
occasion, all were anxious to hear what he had
to say.Gentlemen, said he, with evident
emotion
,
and in the most emphatic, feeling and eloquent
manner, what's the use of talking of some
future
day? We want relief, I tell you!
immediate
relief!
and down he sat amidst a universal roar of laughter.
The next day he failed!
The late Charles Gilfert, the quondam manager
of the Bowery theatre, was a peculiar fellow, and
one of the most fascinating men of his day. At
Albany he met with a Mr. Lemair, a Frenchman, of
whom he borrowed money until he nearly ruined
him. Lemair was one day in a towering rage at the
cause of his misfortunes, and used to tell the
following
characteristic story of his friend:Monsieur
Charles Gilfert, he come to Albany. He have ruin
me in my business
mes affaires
. He borrow
de
l'argent
from me to large amount. He go to
New-York
,
and promise to send him, right avay, ver
quick. But,
voyez-vous
, when I write him, he
return
me von
rponse inconvenante
, von impudent
answer, and say, I may go to de devil for look for
him. I leave Albany instantly, determined to have
the grand personal satisfaction for the affront he put
upon me. I walk straight avay from de
bateau
vapeur
, de steamboat. I go to my boarding-house.
I procure von large stick, and rush out of de
pension
to meet him. By-and-by,
bientt
, I see him von large
vay off, very remotely. I immedaitely button up
my coat vith strong determination, and hold my
stick fierce in my hand, to break his neck several
time. Ven he come near, my indignation rise.
He put out his hand. I reject him. He smile, and
look over his spectacles at me. I say, you von
scoundrel,
coquin infame
. He smile de more, and
make
un grand effort
, a great trial, to pacify my
grande indignation, and before he leave me, he
borrow
twenty dollare from me once more, by gar! A
ver pleasant man vas Monsieur Charles Gilfert; ver
nice man to borrow
l'argent, ma foi!
Gilfert, like Sheridan, was in the habit of
borrowing
money from everybody, very little of which was
ever paid back; but he always intended to return
it at the time he promised. He was a visionary
man, and did not make the best calculations in the
world. We heard of his meeting a friend in the
Bowery, one day, when the following circumstance
took place:
Ah, said Gilfert, you are the very man I
wanted to see. Lend me two hundred dollars.
I would, in a moment, replied his friend, but
it is impossible. I have a note to pay, and I don't
know where to get the money.
A note, said Gilfert, so have I. Let me see
your notice.
The gentleman produced it from his pocket-book.
Well, said Gilfert, how much are you short?
About two hundred dollars, said his friend.
To his utter surprise, Gilfert handed him the money.
There, said he, go and pay your note. I'll
let mine be protested, as they can't both be taken
up. If your note laid over, it might hurt your
credit, but with me it don't matter, as I am used to
that sort of business.
At one time Gilfert owed Conrad, the printer, a
bill. Conrad grew tired of dunning him for it, and
one day wrote Gilfert a letter, which put the
manager
in a towering fury. Down he sat, and challenged
Conrad to fight, declaring that if he refused, he
would horsewhip him in the public streets the next
day. Conrad returned for answer that he would
not fight, until his bill was paid, as no man in his
senses would voluntarily go out to shoot at his own
money. Some few weeks after this occurrence,
Gilfert had an unexpected windfall. Conrad
received
K*
a letter from him, couched in something like
the following terms:
My dear conrad
I was wrong, but you had
no right to insult me. Yet I ought to have paid you
the money before. I enclose it to you now,
principal
and interest. Come and dine with me.
Tout
vous
.
Gilfert
.
What a pity it is that some good writer would not
give us the memoirs of this extraordinary man.
MR. BEVERLEY LEE.
MR. BEVERLEY LEE;
OR,
THE DAYS OF THE SHIN-PLASTERS.
Who's in or out, who moves the grand machine,
Nor stirs my curiosity nor spleen;
Secrets of state no more I wish to know
Than secret movements of a puppet show;
Let but the puppets move, I've my desire,
Unseen the hand which guides the master wire.
Churchill
.
The benefits he sow'd in me, met not
Unthankful ground, but yielded him his own
With fair increase; and still I glory in it.
Massinger
.
The dearest friend to me, the kindest man,
The best conditioned and unwearied spirit
In doing courtesies.
Shakspeare
.
Wall-street
was in commotion. The
pavements
of that busy, bustling mart were crowded
with brokers, bank-directors, merchants, speculators,
politicians, editors, and all the other representatives
of the commercial metropolis. Care and anxiety
were written on every countenance. It was a time
of unusual embarrassment. Commerce, trade, and
all the resources of the country were paralyzed.
Discontent and murmurings were heard in every
quarter. There was a panic.
General Jackson had destroyed the country!
said a whig.
Mr. Biddle has curtailed our discounts! said
a conservative.
All confidence is lost! said a reformer.
And every merchant in New-York must fail!
said a loco-foco.
We are on the eve of a revolution! ejaculated
a patriotic little stock-jobber, the chairman of a ward
meeting; and if we don't do away with the
government
,
the government will do away with us;
therefore, I say, down with the government!
Down with the bank! responded an
administration
worthy near him, with equal fervour and
patriotism.
Neither the government nor the bank are
answerable
for the present condition of things, said
a meddling little secretary of an insurance company,
who stepped in as mediator between the contending
parties.
To what is it owing, then? asked they.
To the great fire of the sixteenth of December,
which destroyed one section of our city and twenty
millions of property.
Not at all, said the editor of a political journal,
who was supposed to know everything, past, present
and to come. Our calamities are owing to the
enormous speculations which have taken place in
real estate. We needed a check of some sort. We
were buying lots in the moon and laying out
lithographic
cities in the stars, and the consequence is a
revulsion unparalleled in our annals.
The conversation was here interrupted by the
news that some twenty new bankruptcies had
occurred
among the oldest mercantile houses in the
city; that one bank had stopped payment, and that
a run had been commenced on the others. All was
confusion and dismay. Individuals were seen
hurrying
to and fro with bags of coin upon their
shoulders
,
of which they had just been draining the banks.
Idle rumours were everywhere circulated.
The president of one of the banks had committed
suicide, and others had absconded with the moneys
committed to their trust. Mobs were forming to lay
waste all the monied institutions of the city, and to
tumble the buildings about the ears of their officers.
The mayor had called out the military to preserve
the public peace. The police patroled the streets
by day, and the watch was doubled by night. The
citizens of New-York were in dread of fire and the
sword.
The hour of three, P.M., when all business
ordinarily
ceases in Wall-street, at length arrived. The
omnibusses, those most convenient things in the
world, (only when you want them, particularly on
rainy days, they are either full or going the wrong
way,) rumbled over the pavements. The multitude
began to scatter; but, long after the money
depositories
were closed, might be seen lingering around
the bulletins of the newspaper-offices, knots of
anxious
,
discontented spirits, talking over the events of
the day and anticipating the horrors of the morrow.
It was in one of these little assemblies that Mr.
Beverley Lee, a handsome, fashionable, light-hearted
young fellow, a contributor to the periodicals and
an author of no mean celebrity, became a
participator
in the all-engrossing conversations of the times.
Mivins, an opulent, influential broker, who was
accounted
a good man on 'change, and proudly
denominated in that vicinity a bear, took him by
the button, and pointing out the ruins of a building
that had fallen to the ground not long before, said,
That, sir, is now all that remains of those who
were nick-named the Rothschilds of this country.
I am sorry for their misfortunes, said Lee.
Sorry! rejoined the broker, if my wish could
be realized, not only they, but all the Jews in
New-York
should be buried in the ruins.
Why so? said Belmont, a calm, dignified,
silvery-haired
,
feeble old gentleman, who stood next
L
to Lee, and who had been listening to their discourse
without taking any part in it.
Because, said Mivins, raising his voice, and
clenching his hand with strong emotion, in my
opinion, it's part of the religious creed of a Jew to
cheat a Christian.
The Christian religion does not teach you that
precept, said Belmont, mildly, a slight flush passing
over his fine countenance as he turned upon his heel
to depart.
Stop, sir, said Mivins, placing his hand upon
the old gentleman's shoulder and detaining him, if
you mean any thing by what you have just said, you
mean to insult me, and thus I resent it, added he,
furiously, spitting upon his garments.
Belmont instantly rushed upon his assailant, and
Lee, perceiving his danger, flung himself between
the parties just in time to receive the blow aimed at
his new acquaintance full upon his own stalworth
bosom. A scuffle ensued; but the parties were
soon separated. Not, however, until cards had been
exchanged, and the residence of each individual
ascertained. That evening Mivins was waited upon
with a cartel, and a meeting appointed for the
morning
.
Lee did not retire to rest until late that night;
his mind was filled with contending emotions. It
was the first time his person had ever been profaned
by a blow, and he was on the eve of washing out
the stain upon his honour with his blood. Of all
characters on earth, he detested that of a duellist
most; but he was young, ardent, and full of those
false notions of honour which have deprived the
world of some of its brightest ornaments. The few
hours that were left him before the meeting, were
employed in making his testament, and in writing to
one who was dearer to him than life. To her he
enclosed a lock of his hair, and a tear fell upon its
glossy brightness at the thought that they might
never meet again.
At the break of day, which was cold, comfortless
and misty, two small boats were seen shooting
across the Hudson river towards the Jersey shore.
They arrived at nearly the same time. Lee and
Mivins stood upon the bloodstained spot where
Hamilton fell. As the parties were about taking
their stations, they were interrupted by the sudden
appearance of the venerable Belmont, who had been
the innocent cause of their meeting. Approaching
Lee, he said
Young man, this quarrel is mine; and, turning
to Mivins, he continued, from you, sir, I expect
atonement for the affront you offered me yesterday.
I came here, replied Mivins, to fight, not to
talk. Finding myself in the wrong, however, I am
willing to make such atonement as is in my power.
Of you, sir, I ask pardon for what was done in a
moment of excitement, and which, I hope, your
generosity will forgive.
Mr. Belmont received his apology, and they
approached
Mr. Lee, who stood pistol in hand, waiting
the result of their conversation.
Mr. Lee, said the broker, if a voluntary
apology will be accepted by you for an insult which
I certainly never intended, I am prepared to make
one.
Proceed, sir, said Lee.
The blow, sir, was not directed at you, but at
this gentleman. I sincerely regret what has
happened
;
and as an evidence of my conviction that I
was to blame, allow me to state in the presence of
these gentlemen, that had not this interruption taken
place, I intended to have received your fire
unreturned
;
and, if I were living, to have made the
concessions which I now freely tender.
Lee took the broker's proffered hand, and they all
returned to the boat of Mr. Belmont. When they
were seated, Belmont said to Mr. Lee
You, sir, have done me a service, and I have
registered it, `where every day I'll turn the leaf to
read it.' Like the Indian missionary, `injuries I
write on sand, but benefits upon marble.'
Lee did not reply; but there was something in
Mr. Belmont's tone and manner that strangely
interested
him, and he returned the pressure of his
hand with all the warmth of glowing friendship.
But little of moment occurred on the water except
meeting, when about half way across, a mysterious
looking craft running foul of a schooner in the mist,
which it was afterwards ascertained contained the
burly person of Old Hays and a posse of police
officers, making their clumsy way to the scene of
action; but, as usual, these worthies were too late to
prevent the violation of the law or a breach of the
peace.
After the veritable events, which, like faithful
chroniclers we have just recorded, a scene of
confusion
took place in the city of New-York which baffles
all description. The banks suspended specie
payments
;
gold and silver were at a high premium.
The town was inundated with a species of small
paper
L*
currency, issued by every individual wishing to
make money
, specimens of which have been
preserved
as curiosities to the present day. These were
small pieces of pasteboard, commonly called
shin-plasters
,
having printed thereon in Roman capitals,
good for six and a quarter cents, or any other
sum which seemed
good
to the person issuing the
same, and having his own christian and sirname
legibly written in the right hand corner of the paper.
These circulated as freely among the community as
omnibus tickets or bank notes, and possessed really
about as much intrinsic value.
The term shin-plaster originated with an old
soldier
of the revolutionary war, who, after fighting the
battles of his country, was left to penury and want
by a government, who paid him for his services in
what was commonly denominated, continental
money, which, after the peace, it refused to redeem.
This old soldier had received a wound upon the leg
at the battle of Bunker Hill; and believing that
the money was printed upon paper of an
adhesive
quality, and knowing it to be good for nothing else,
he was in the habit of dressing his wound with the
rags, and calling them shin plasters; hence the
name, which will always stick to them to the end of
the world.
The city, as we said, was in commotion. The
inhabitants
seemed beside themselves. Every one
appeared
to be acting a part in the great comedy of
Frightened to Death. The example set by the
merchant was followed by all other classes. Stopping
payment was universal. All business was at a stand
still. Men assembled in clusters on the corners of
the streets. Argument ran high, and the everlasting
words of General JacksonTammany-HallThe
MonsterBribery and CorruptionNick Biddle
VetoPewter MugRuinLoco-FocoReal
Estate
Henry
ClayThe PeopleFanny Wright
and other villanous compounds of the alphabet, were
dinned into the ears of all who would listen to
them. Enormous hand-bills were posted about the
city, calling public-meetings in the Park.
Committees
were appointed to go to Washington and
Albany. Processions of tatterdemalions moved
through the streets with bands of music and
colours
flying. Those who had notes to pay were
shinning it to borrow the money. If they succeeded,
the notes were paid; if not, they were laid over,
and nothing more was thought of the matter. Men
of all professions, callings, and occupations, were
idle, except the notaries, who fattened on the
distresses
of all around them, and were busy from the
time the banks closed until late in the evening,
protesting
the notes of all unfortunate makers of the
same who were unable to cancel them as they had
promised.
Woful were the misgivings of the merchants;
woful were the forebodings of the mechanic; and
woful were the apprehensions and countenances of
all misguided victims who had speculated in building
lots and lithographic cities!
Mr. Beverley Lee, we are sorry to say, was one
of this latter class. On his leaving college, he came
into possession of fifty thousand dollars. Being an
embryo author, whose craft taught him to build
castles
in the aira man of fancyyoung, ardent, and
inexperienced, and hearing what immense fortunes
had been amassed by speculating in lots, in an evil
hour he attended a sale of real estate at the
Merchants
Exchange.
He bought lots on the Avenueshe bought lots at
Harlemhe bought lots at New-Brightonhe bought
lots at Skaneateleshe bought lots at Jamaicahe
bought lots at Buffalohe bought lots at Cahawba
he bought lots in Texasand, in short, he bought
lots everywhere. He had building lots, and water
lots, and all sorts of lots. He was the owner of
towns, villages, and counties.
To obtain these invaluable privileges, he had paid
every farthing of his fifty thousand dollars, had
given his notes for several hundred thousand, and
mortgaged his estate to an unimaginable amount.
He was a great landholderone of the lords of the
soil. His word was good on 'change. Bank
directors
took their hats off to him. Dealers in fancy
stock greeted him with smiles; and Mr. Beverley
Lee was a man estimated to be worth millions of
dollars. While this delusion lasted, everything
went on swimmingly. What the people thought of
Mr. Beverley Lee, Mr. Beverley Lee thought of
himself. It was an exceedingly agreeable thing to
be rich
very
rich, enormously rich, and to become
so too all of a sudden, and without the least exertion.
Mr. Beverley Lee purchased a town-house, a
country-house
,
a villa on the banks of the Hudson, and
he embellished his mansions with gorgeous furniture.
He gave entertainments to his friends, and regaled
them with costly viands. He rolled in riches. It
was pleasant
very
.
Time, however, that rigid schoolmaster, taught
Mr. Beverley Lee a lesson, which it would have been
better for him had he sooner learned. He knew he
became suddenly rich, but it never occurred to him
that he might become suddenly poor. True, he had
read that riches take to themselves wings and fly
away; but he had read that passage as applicable to
other men, not to himself. When the veto came,
he opened his eyes, and began to look about him.
He feared there would be a storm, but he did not
look for a tornado. First came the assessors, and
demanded of him a thumping sum of money for
opening
streets and improving his property. This Mr.
Beverley Lee paid, thinking it very kind in them to
take such good care of his interests, considering he
had not the honour of their acquaintance. Next
came the tax-gatherers, with large demands, which
Mr. Beverley Lee cancelled with rather a sorry
grace. Then came the holders of mortgages for
their interest, which drained Mr. Beverley Lee of
his last shilling, and he was obliged to have recourse
to the banks for a new discount to keep up
appearances
.
This he readily obtained, and things went on
very well with Mr. Beverley Lee, until the banks
were compelled to deny him further favours. Then
his difficulties began to thicken. The notes he had
given for his property fell due one after the other,
and were protested. In walked the auctioneer, and
began to knock down his beautiful furniture, his
library
,
his racing-stud, his country-house, his
town-house
,
and everything that was his, real or
imaginary
.
His lots, building and water, reverted to their
original owners; and Mr. Beverley Lee, was, in the
year eighteen hundred and thirty-six, obliged to
waddle
out of Wall-street as
lame a duck
as was
ever hatched in that nest of disappointment and
speculation.
In an elegantly finished mansion near the Battery,
about a year after the events just related, a family
were seated round the evening fireside. Emily
Withers was reclining on an ottoman, listening to
the conversation of her parents and Mr. Larence
Payne, a young attorney of small practice, but large
expectations, who professed a great regard for the
Withers in general, and the young lady in
particular
,
who had on several occasions given him the most
unequivocal proofs of her utter aversion. He,
however
,
was not easily discouraged, and continued his
visits, in the hopes of one day possessing not only
the heart, but, what was of more consequence to
him, the fortune of the lady.
Emily, was a lovely, dark-eyed girl, perfect in
form and feature, and the reigning belle and beauty
of the town. She was an only child, and the sole
hope of her fond and doating parents. She was very
beautiful, and throngs of admirers had sought her
hand in vain. On her first entrance into society,
she was a light-hearted, merry creature, full of mirth
and good-humour; but of late and wherefore, none
could tell, a sad depressing melancholy had taken
possession of her thoughts; and, as she leaned her
head upon her hand, which was buried in her
luxuriant
tresses, the most casual might observe that
all was not at ease about her heart. She was
listening, we said, to the conversation; and when
Mr. Lee's name was mentioned, a crimson flush
stole over the pearly texture of her face and bosom,
which spoke more truly than words, that she listened
with an interest she in vain endeavoured to conceal.
I do not think, said Mr. Withers, that Mr.
Lee is the man you represent him.
I am sure he is not, said his wife; and the
eyes of Emily kindled with emotion as her mother
spoke.
What! said Payne, did he not cheat all his
creditors, and run away?
I have heard that his failure was owing to the
fall of real estate, said Mr. Withers.
And from whom did you hear that? inquired
Payne.
From my friend Mivens, the broker, with whom
you may recollect he had a duel, which
Ended in smoke, said the attorney, with a
smirk, intended to convey a stronger meaning than
his words expressed.
Yet, in that affair, Mivins said he behaved like
a man of the strictest honour.
Honour! said the attorney, emphatically; yet,
at the same time, drawling out the word Iago-like,
as `though there was some hidden monster in his
thought.'
Yes, sir, honour. Mivins says that affair bound
him to Lee for ever, and that he would endorse his
honour with his life. He also declared that, when
he heard of Lee's embarrassments, he would have
assisted him to the utmost extent of his means, if he
could have found him; but he had disappeared, and
no one knew whither he had gone.
Mivins, you know, my dear, said he to his
wife, though an impetuous, hasty man, has a noble,
generous heart.
He has, indeed, my dear, replied Mrs. Withers.
During the last part of this conversation, Emily had,
unperceived by any one, unfolded a small
billetdoux
,
which contained a lock of dark glossy hair;
and a liquid pearl shot into her eye as she recalled
M
the image of him who had sent it, and read over the
kind words of affection that accompanied the
treasured
relick. Looking up, she noticed that the eyes
of the attorney were riveted upon her; she hastily
concealed the note in her bosom, and turned upon
him a glance of cold contempt and indignation.
Do you know, Mr. Payne, inquired Mrs.
Withers
,
what became of Mr. Lee after his failure?
I know nothing more than I have told you, said
Payne. I could not keep the run of him. He gave
me leg-bail for the last suit I brought against him,
which I believe was all the bail he had to give. I
wish I could catch him now.
What for? asked Withers.
To lock him up.
Why?
Because I never liked him.
What offence has he given you?
None; but I always considered him a man of
shallow partsa self-conceited, inflated coxcomb
a bankrupt, who defrauded honest people out of their
just demands, and who proved himself a coward,
by running away from those whom he had not the
courage to face.
Emily rose from her seat, her eyes flashing fire,
and her lip quivering like a rose-leaf in a storm.
Silence, sir! I wonder you do not blush to
slander
the innocent in their absence. I am ashamed to
have remained here so long to hear him abused.
`A man of shallow parts!' If you possessed but a
moiety of his mind, you might be a gentleman. `A
coward,' sir! It would be more than your
pernicious
soul is worth, to breathe that in his presence.
O shame upon you, to make his misfortunes your
triumph! I'll not hear you, sir, continued Emily,
as the crest-fallen attorney was about to reply.
You have slandered the absent, and insulted those
present; and I wonder my parents have listened to
you so long. As she spoke these words, she quitted
the apartment, leaving her father and mother in
mute astonishment, and the attorney riveted to the
spot.
The feelings of Payne may be imagined. He had
missed the mark at which he aimed, and wounded
the heart he hoped to win. He left the house shortly
afterwards sunk in his own estimation, and
seriously
meditating a jaunt to Texas.
On the following afternoon, just before five, the
wharf at the foot of Courtlandt-street was filled with
people of all descriptions, making their way out of
the city. It was near the hour for the departure of
the steamboats, and consequently carts, carriages,
and omnibussesmen, women, and children
wheelbarrows, porters, carriers and news-boys, were
crowded together promiscuously.
Here's the Courier and Enquirer, sir.
Here's the Star, sir; buy the good old major,
sir, for a trifle.
Three Americans for sixpence, sir.
Sun, Transcript, Herald, and New Era.
Baggage for West-Point, sir.
That's your bandbox, ma'am, which the porter
smashed. I'll take care of it for you, ma'am.
Do, Peter, that's a good lad.
All ashore that's going.
Haul in the plank.
Whizphizwhiz.
Let go that linehaul in.
And away darted the North America, like a
foaming
steed let loose, boldly and gallantly, out into the
sparkling river.
Ding-a-ling-a-lingAll those as has not settled
their fare, step to the capting's office and do it
there. Ding-a-ling.
And by the time the passage is paid and the
luggage
recovered, the passengers find themselves
splashing and dashing beneath the Palisades, some
miles on their way to Albany.
The
departure
of the steamboats from the city, on
a clear summer's afternoon, is a beautiful sight.
They all leave at the same hour, and they shoot from
the innumerable piers out into the glassy stream in
such numbers, that one would think half the
population
were slipping away, and wonder how it is
they are not missed from the metropolis.
Among those on board the North America, were
Mr. and Mrs. Withers and their lovely daughter,
who had just commenced the fashionable tour of the
season. But their presence was forgotten or
unnoticed
,
in the circulation of a report which spread
like a panic among the passengers, that a notorious
individual, of whom everybody had heard, but whom
nobody had seen, was on board. This person had
made more noise in the city of New-York, than any
one who had lived since the abdication of Peter
Stuyvesant. He of the Iron-maskthe author of
Juniusthe Great Unknownhad not excited more
curiosity in their day and generation, than the
mysterious
being of whom we are now writing. To
that strange character had been attributed all the
manifold disasters of the country: the hard times
the suspension of specie paymentsthe troubles of
abolition, and every other evil that threatened the
safety of the republic. He possessed a wonderful
faculty for doing mischief, and what was more
wonderful
still, a sort of magical ubiquity, for he was
here, there, and everywhere at the same time. At
one moment he was in Wall-street, levelling the
banks with staves and bludgeons; at another, he
was assaulting the arsenal of the state, (where, by
the way, it is said he captured and imprisoned the
M*
commissary-general, his son George, and Cornelius
the carpenter.) He was a great agitator, and his
name struck terror to the hearts and souls of the
Gothamites.
Who could he be? asked everybody; but
nobody
knew.
From what we have just said, the reader will at
once perceive that
the man in the claret-coloured
coat
was on board the steamer.
But where he was, or what he was, or who he
was, remained as profound a mystery as the
philosopher's
stone.
The shades of evening thickened among the
High-lands
,
and the dew-dropping clouds hung like misty
veils over the hill-tops, concealing their beauty and
shrouding them from the sight. The passengers
retired
to their cabins, and, notwithstanding the
curiosity
of all, the man in the claret-coloured coat was
nowhere to be seen, although it was ascertained to a
certainty that he was on board. The North
America
arrived in Albany before the break of day, and
long ere any of the sleepers were stirring, that
shadowy, invisible spirit had gone on shore and
vanished into thin air.
Some said he was on his way to Canada to join
the patriots; and, for the peace of the good city of
New-York, we not only hope the story is true, but
that the arch-fiend in human shape may be shot there,
and trouble our worthy fellow-citizens no more.
At Albany, Emily Withers and her parents took
the cars for Saratoga, where we shall leave them to
drink the hygeian-waters, and pass away the sultry
months of summer.
Seated in a gloomy apartment in a remote part of
the town, was a poor authorpale and emaciated,
and just recovering from a protracted indisposition,
that had nearly brought him to the grave. He was
completing a new work of fiction for the press of
Lea and Blanchard, who, with a liberality usual
with those enlightened bibliopoles, when they
discover
undoubted genius and unemployed talent, had
paid for the work in advance, and thus prevented
the author from starving while he wrote. A table,
a few chairs, writing materials, the works of
Shakspeare
,
Walter Scott and Washington Irving, were
the principal articles in his room. The author's
loose morning-gown, like himself, had seen better
days; and his shirt-collar being unbuttoned and
falling on his shoulders, disclosed a throat and head
that might have furnished a study for the sculptor.
His pale features were occasionally lighted with a
smile, and fire kindled in his thoughtful eye as the
rich treasures of his mind were poured upon the
paper. The work was finished. He laid aside his
pen, and leaning his head upon his hand, communed
with himself.
My task is accomplished. The desire of my
heart is at length fulfilled, and though times have
sadly changed with me, and the blind goddess
proven herself a fickle jade, yet I feel that by
industry
and my pen, I may yet retrieve my sunken
fortunes
.
Well, the past were pleasant days, but they
have vanished, and with them all the hopes they
inspired. Pain, penury, and disease have long
exiled
me from the world; but I shall return to it
again, a wiser, and I trust a better man. O Emily,
why does your bright image mingle with all my
fondest recollections of by-gone times? You have
forgotten me now; yet, how devotedly have I loved.
Proud, passionate and wealthy, the world is all
before
you where to choose; and, though in the hours
of my prosperity, hope flattered me with the belief
that you would one day be mine, it would be
presumption
now. No, Emily, that golden dream is
overmy heart is breaking at the thought that you
never, never can be mine!
Little knew Mr. Lee (it was he who spoke,) the
heart of faithful, trusting, doating woman. When
her affections are once bestowed, she smiles at all
the reverses of the world, and her love endures when
all else perishes. Woman's love is like the hardy
evergreen of our own native groves, and looks as
cheerful in the storms of winter as when the genial
airs of spring-time play around its branches, and all
the other trees of the forest dress themselves in
holliday apparel, amid the melody of birds and the
silvery sounds of running waters.
Our author's revery was broken by a knock at the
door of his apartment; he arose to let the intruder
in, and the detested person of Larence Payne stood
before him.
So, said the attorney, I have found you at
last. Snug quarters thesequite out of the way of
the bailiffs, eh, Mr. Lee? Well, this is much better
than paying notes, interest, assessments and taxes.
Everything quite comfortable and snug, I declare.
To what, said Lee, recovering from his
surprise
,
am I indebted for this intrusion?
Intrusion! Well, I like that phraseology. No
intrusion at allnot in the least. I came by order
of a court of law, and here are two bailiffs with writs
in their pockets for you; so you see you are wanted
and must go.
If you were not beneath my notice, I would
throw you out of the window for your impertinence,
said Lee. Solely on account of your insignificance,
I let you escape!
Excessively glad to hear it, said Mr. Larence
Payne, as, with an oblique movement, he made the
best of his way down stairs, followed by the sheriffs
and their prisoner.
On their arrival at the City-hall, Mr. Lee was
astonished to learn that every judgment against him
had been cancelled on the record, and that he was
free from debt and at liberty. At this unexpected
news, the attorney, unperceived by any one, skulked
away from the Hall, and was soon in a place of
concealment.
Mr. Lee was lost in amazement at this
unlooked-for
stroke of good fortune. He breathed more freely
than he had done for months. It seemed as though
a mountain of difficulty had been rolled from his
mind; he was a new creature. But who was his
benefactor? What generous spirit was it that
stepped
forward in his moment of greatest need and
released
him from bondage? Was it Mivins the
broker? It must be he. Lee knew no other
individual
in the world capable of such an act. It was
like him. It was noble.
Within the last year a change had come over the
destinies of New-York. Commerce once more
spread her snowy pinions to the breeze. The
hammer
sounded cheerfully upon the anvil. The banks
resumed the payment of specie. Confidence was
restored. Talent, enterprise and industry again
received
their merited reward, and bright hearts and
smiling faces were everywhere to be seen. It seemed
as though the wand of Prospero had been at work
such a change came over the whole community.
The gay and fashionable had returned from their
summer tour, and Emily Withers was once more in
town, improved in health and radiant in beauty.
It was an autumn evening. A line of carriages
stood in State-street and round the Battery, their
lamps sparkling like fire-flies among the trees, and
illuminating the neighbourhood far and near. The
house of Mr. Withers streamed with light, and was
thronged with company. There was a wedding
there. The guests had all arrived. Among them
the venerable Belmont, who was the presiding
genius
of the scene.
When in England, whither he had gone, shortly
after the duel mentioned in the early part of this
narrative, he heard of Lee's misfortunes, and taking
the first packet, he hastened to relieve them. On
his arrival in New-York, he cancelled all his
responsibilities
,
for his wealth was inexhaustible, and
settled
upon Mr. Lee the fifty thousand dollars he had
so thoughtlessly lost in his speculations, and had
hither come to witness the happiness of his friend
in his union with the blooming Emily.
Why have you taken such an interest in that
young man? asked Mivins the broker.
He did me a service, and it is a debt of gratitude
paid by a
Jew
to a
Christian
.
My story is doneBut what, asks the reader,
became of little Payne the attorney?
He did not go to Texas, but to Canada, to fight
the battles of the patriots.
And died there?
Yes, gallantly fighting by the side of THE MAN
IN THE CLARET-COLOURED COAT.